Update: Ok, feeling better! Terry could see I was a bit grisly about his reaction but he did emphasize that he loved the event, the surprise it’s just a bit conflicting for him when he has his determination set, so yes, I can understand that. Plus it helps that I had a fabulous fast run! Speed went from 6mph to 6.2!! Bring it on!! I’m ready for Jan 21 4M Race!!
I think one of the things I enjoy about RiRi Bazar of H.M.A.E.M. (that would be “Hate Me and Eat Me”) is she never looks at life in black and white. She imagines with her mind throttled wide open and always comes up with something previously unseen. She isn’t afraid of life and often I think she, in some way, is making life, mine at least, that much happier a place because all she makes is filled with humor and a bit of magical whimsy. The other thing I enjoy, is as a person whose favorite thing to do is create my own style, her pieces are often perfect for a focal point to create around. That is my favorite way to style. To find one piece (and in creative styling, its seldom the clothes I style around), I find really interesting, put it on while naked, and then just build around the item. Sometimes, ok oft, I run amok and have to start over from the beginning, but seldom, and never with H.M.A.E.M., have I had to abandon the original item.
I made my card with regular striped paper cut on the diagonal both ways to make the Chevron pattern. I added little rhinestones on the points and stamped your number one. I'll be giving this to my Dad. He checks my blog often so I won't be posting this card until after Father's Day.. I really want it to be a surprise for him...
20 000 troops in haiti
There is no hint of lust or depravity here, just sensual comfort and companionship. It is the beautiful chastity and continence of faithful God fearing people.
He demanded an explanation from Inspector-General of Police Ismail Omar, and advised all journalists who suffered at the hands of the police to lodge reports.
Every Thursday-afternoon one of my sons will pick three names. The rest will go back in the basket to have another chance in the next round on the next Thursday.
After the second rest, fold the dough again. Cut into 3 pieces, shape each pieces into a ball. Place each ball into ziplock bag, refrigerate for 24 to 36 hours.
-make the bed
December 6
(I purchased one from Rimann in PV and one from Batson in Mission, and picked up a 12 pack of Bud Light for the hubby to keep the peace. ) I am all about Belgians, apparently. I can't wait to pop the cork on one tonight - I have been saving them for the weekend. It gave me something to look forward to all week. :)
One by one I defeated them all
Workin' for The Man ev'ry night and day,
After getting engaged to Chip- I moved back to Idaho to help plan the wedding. (I didn't plan anything really.... my awesome mom did it all. ;D) While I was waiting for the Big Day I went back to work at the Zip Trip. This time I was old enough (19) to sell beer, so they let me work the gas station side, and I didn't work the food side. Hal-leigh-lou! I thought it was so fun working the grave-yard shift. Seriously.... in a small town... working the grave yard shift, the only people who came in were cops and truckers. The police officers apparently didn't remember me from the 27 times they pulled me over, and were really nice to me. :D One of the officers would pull around the gas station at least once an hour- if they didn't see me through the windows, they would come inside and check on me and make sure I was okay. (nice, huh?) Plus they always took out my garbage so I wouldn't have to go outside in the middle of the night. I let them have free coffee. :)
We are not all of these. To us, they are commonplace, part of our lives. To us, it’s how we grew up and will continue teaching our children about our cultures and traditions. These “Western narratives” hurt us at the end and have damaged perspectives regarding non-Western narratives. The dominance of Western narratives has silenced non-Western voices, reducing us to nothing else but something out of a travel guide. Unfortunately, Western publishing continues to perpetuate such misconceptions and have created problem after problem for people outside the (white) fence.
Today is Armistice Day!
Lowlights -No idea who the two fighting next week are.
The lesson to me:
Now if you excuse me, I need to set up the table for a private tea party between Little Miss, Barbie and I.
The SoCon has never sent more than one team — the tournament champion, who earns an automatic bid — to the Big Dance, which expanded to a field of 68 teams last year.
But this is getting too political, and I'm really just here to talk about juiceboxes and bacon and monkeys disguised as humans. I mean, no matter who we are, we can agree on those things.
What right do we as Rakyat have if we can not even have a decent meal in a restaurant, way way past the “incident time” . This happened around 7pm on 28th of April..yes.. 7pm !
LCD Soundsystem
A storm from the beginnings of time
In their summer journal, pose the questions to your child, "What is global warming? How is EVERYTHING affected by it? And, what do you think YOU can do to help "save" the Earth?"You can also check out Sylvan Dell's Teaching Activities, which include "then" and "now" photographs of several different glaciers and information about animal adaptations, as well as lots of other related activities.
The first published use of “super-hero” appears in Alan Bott’s 1917 Airman Outings. It was a complaint then too. Bott was objecting that members of Parliament were exaggerating the powers of British fighter pilots by calling them “the super-heroes of the war.”
For my independent organism to work with, I am hoping to sequence Curtobacterium flaccumfaciens, a known plant pathogen that was tracked into the human built environment. There aren’t any projects planned to sequence this organism or its relatives, so this seems like an ideal candidate for our project. Its potential application to the built environment includes its ability to harm plants grown in the indoors, and/or harm crop plants that could make their way into our food. This sounds like a very interesting bacterium to study because of the REAL world effects!
Einstein wrote this quiz last century. He said that 98% of the people in the world cannot solve the quiz.
Best of all, though, I don't have much pain during the day and I actually feel better overall. Some of the beer belly might be shifting into other parts of the body or getting burned off entirely. Who knows, but this was a pretty successful week
3And I saw one of his heads as it were wounded to death; and his deadly wound was healed: and all the world wondered after the beast.
And every desperate word
“The book is worth a read for the ideas you haven't thought through before, and a skim for the parts that you already know well. The personal accounts are moving and thoughtfully chosen to illustrate important considerations for Latter-day Saints in regards to their interactions with homosexuals. The summaries of scientific research are put together in a logical way, with descriptions that appear to be mostly accessible to the lay reader without losing accuracy… Thanks for this, Brad. I'm frankly embarrassed by how uninformed I was regarding homosexuality.”
The man is a winner, it has translated from college to the NFL. He is a leader and rises to the clutch occasion. He has his flaws just like anybody else and he’s only human. But to win games and lead a team left for dead to first place in the division and possibly hosting a playoff game, is an achievement for any player. This offseason, regardless of how this season results, he will go into next season as the starter. Perhaps he gains more trust in the staff and they throw more next season. The kid can run and has a loaded box stacked against him defensively, yet he is still doing what he’s doing. He is making throws when defenses expect him to throw, and long yardage situations and from behind. This guy will be a force to be reckoned with, and I mean passing the football. He’s winning with a one-dimensional approach, and you can see the incremental improvements weekly. Like I said in the past, he is starting a new trend and giving more players hope and creating opportunities to succeed at the NFL level.
We are an experiment going right for a change
These "rusted tin letters" were swagged over a Union Jack collage in my British Invasion post. For the cord, I just used some crochet thread finger crocheted to the length needed. Really, anything would do. Just use what you have on hand: twine, yarn, wire, chain, whatever you can lay your hands on.
This space is a funny balance of sharing enough to be transparent and honest (which is why I even write) along with trying not to be offensive and polarizing.
‘The reward for perseverance’
All the elements in Punchline have been designed by professionals with the look and feel of motion graphics in mind, with elegance and dynamic moves.
when my Lady Spring announced
The prohibitionists already have a foot in the door and minimum pricing wedges it open further. It is no means certain that it will be to the advantage of pub drinkers and pubs as Mudgie points out. CAMRA as an organisation needs to think again.
Pours a cloudy apricot/straw color with a fizzy white head that reduced to a thin froth. The nose has a bit a of barnyard funkiness to it with hints of lemon. The tastes starts with light citrus notes then transitions into tart green apples, peach and white pepper. Next comes a dry oakiness that compliments the tartness well. The finish is a combination a champagne like dryness and bitter florals.
Sat-AM: 1:32, 3100' ~ Flag Mt. + Green Mt. (Boulder Basic)
*Always KEEP a positive mental attitude for this to all come together and begin to finally happen for you*
I believe God creates!
No ear has ever heard, no eye ever seen, any God but you
Amanda, me, and Missi at Charlie's house after the funeral. We were all going to visit a bit, change, and hit the road. We made it home with no rain, hail, sleet or snow which is more than I can say going up. Frank and I were both beat by the time we made it to the house.
sipping red rose tea
HF carrier frequency of 3.25 MHz, with X-mode polarization,
Scrunch up each layer of tissue paper and squeeze at the bottom.
Every prisoner tried to get a piece of cloth for himself to cushion the logs so as to protect his shoulders, but prisoners still did these duties with patches of bruises incurred as a result of this labour.
Okay..now. Let's get baking!
And dummy me forgot to take a "before" pic! So I'll attempt to describe it.
The other funny thing is, stuff i have no control over is happening too. Synchronicity maybe? Destiny perhaps? Both nice and nasty things. Strange coincidences or people getting in touch out of the blue. Doors opening that i've not noticed before. It's all very mysterious!
(i believe this baby has a good chance, but as we all know round here, sometimes that's not enough.)
Doing More with Fewer Aromas?
/CONTACT: Shirley Cheatham, Manager – Public Affairs, Lockheed Martin Specialty Components, 813-541-8263/
1/4 onion, coursely chopped
Il Gelatauro looked and felt like how a casual coffeeshop feels like in the States, fitting in very much with the whole university city feel of Bologna.
i had a bad dream.
My grandson said there is no such thing and I said even if I have to paint it she will get a pink and purple basketball. I looked it up on AMAZON and sure enough there was a pink and purple spalding basketball. She was so happy and she says brother will not dare take it to play with it.
I go back to school tomorrow after being off for the Easter holiday and Spring Break. While I most definitely didn't get everything I wanted to accomplish checked off of my list, it was a productive break!
A former Texas FBI agent received a downward sentencing departure in his federal criminal case because the judge felt he was additionally punished by the effects of a criminal conviction on his future job prospects, declaring, “Your life is pretty much ruined in terms of any law enforcement job.” Isn't that true of pretty much everybody with a felony conviction?
For all men while ignorant of God were foolish by nature; and they were unable from the good things that are seen to know him who exists, nor did they recognize the craftsman while paying heed to his works; but they supposed that either fire or wind or swift air, or the circle of the stars, or turbulent water, or the luminaries of heaven were the gods that rule the world. If through delight in the beauty of these things men assumed them to be gods, let them know how much better than these is their Lord, for the author of beauty created them! And if men were amazed at their power and working, let them perceive from them how much more powerful is He Who formed them. For from the greatness and beauty of created things comes a corresponding perception of their Creator.
“We’re in a slide. We’re getting to a point where rehabilitation won’t be effective,” said Gerry Davis, the city’s general manager of public works. “Spending a dollar today on the rehabilitation … saves us spending the equivalent of $4 for a full reconstruction.”
Morrissey SJ. Work place design recommendations for the pregnant workers. Int J Ind Ergon 1998; 21: 383-395.
Yep, that’s right, my advice isn’t something as standard as “don’t listen to those asshats who insist you can’t follow your bliss,” although it IS good advice, and not just because I enjoy saying “asshat.” Don’t get me wrong, though, “disregard the haters” is an integral part of my advice - in fact, you could rightly call it prerequisite advice. Disregard the haters, because if you don’t, you will become one of them.
When the darker side of the classical music industry and her mother's ambition collide, Carmen must choose between her career and her love for music
So we got together with the kids to talk about it.
will turn into a conflagration
The coffee sweetener stood balanced on the surface
Nearly two months ago I quit my job. This was a job I’d worked at for a year-and-a-half, which made it the longest job I’d ever held for a continuous amount of time. In one sense this was a really good job: it paid well; I worked with talented, kind people; I had a great amount of respect for the management; and it paid well. However, in another sense it was a bad job: I worked in a cubicle in the suburbs…
So,the answer to our question: chances are you will be fine as long as you do not eat thousands of veggie burgers a day. While there are other alternatives which are indeed healthier and less processed, it won’t hurt you to lower you scruples and have some buffalo chik’n. It’s crispy and perfect with some blue cheese dressing.
He does little things throughout the day to make sure I'm having a good day. If I'm not he tries really hard to change my day to a good one. Even if he's sometimes the reason for the bad day.
01 What Is This Thing Called Love (Porter) 7:03
Although my blog posts may be rarer than they were in the past, Bilingual Butter and I have reconciled again. And boy do I have a lot to tell you...
Sleep: About every other night I get a great night of sleep. On the off nights I wake up at 2AM and this little boy has decided to throw a party in the belly.
So I'm taking a bit of a food adventure. I'm going to try some of these "health" foods that I've read so much about, and then I'll write a review about it. My initial first impressions, and then some possible ways to revamp it into something delicious. Some (like tofu) I have tried before and absolutely detest, but in the name of health, I'm going to have myself a little cook-off and see if I can make it delicious.
I was sealed to my love, Jesse, in the Columbus, Ohio temple on Saturday October, 8th at 11:30 in the morning.
― Malcolm X
There is a lot to do in Paris. But I kind of wish we were in Fontainbleau.
I learned more about writing from Dan Brown (The DaVinci Code, Angels and Demons) than anyone else. He is a master of suspense, every chapter a cliffhanger so that you just can’t put his books down. Period. And I love how he weaves multiple points of view together until they all collide at the end. I wish I could write like that.
Next time, I’ll cut myself with something sharp instead.
Another favorite was downtown...The Driftwood Restaurant.
The area between Punta Mita and the Tres Maria or Isla Marias as the nationals call them has Striped Marlin in fair numbers but only around 150 lbs. Striped Marlin prefer cooler water temperatures and to have Dorado and Striped Marlin is an indication of warm water from somewhere. I am not going to over analyze it, I´ll just go with it and consider myself lucky for them being in the area. So keep your ears on amigos.
We knew that medical records in China were not always correct, but we are thankful she is here in America receiving the proper care. We know she is in God's hand, and he has a plan for this little girl. Our older girls are being great during this as well as being excited about hanging out with their friends instead of having to be at the hospital. We are so thankful for our friends who are helping us with our girls and allowing them to hang with their family.
Orginally posted last Mother's Day. I think it needs repeating:
forgiving hearts.
Don’t know man, I’m not from here
Thermodynamics means “heat” dynamics. The term is used to express the physics of various structural systems and their relation to heat energy. The more energy in a system tends to determine the degree of organized complexity of a physical system.
And my Father in Law... if my Hubby is my biggest cheerleader... then my Father in Law is a very close second... even on the phone... I can feel how much he loves me... and respects me... and I have to tell you... the feeling is definitely mutual.
Often, if there was just no energy and nowhere we had to be, the park, then a cafe would be the days activities.
SMASH CUT to THE WHO, with Daltrey screaming YEEAAAAHHHHHWWWW!
Lets remember that the crisis started back in 2007, four years ago. At the time many said it was an aberration, a blip, likely to be limited to one or two banks.
Contre les jacobins, le siècle et le péché.
Used 2 packs of Safale US-04 as I am fermenting this one cooler than normal, 60 - 62F. Aerated for 30 minutes with aeration stone.
Monday morning the other troop of Byng's left for the ferry. Jordan was back at work, and we decided to take a family of 4 day and go to our favorite beach. Willingdon Beach. First we went to go on a walk however about 20 ft into the trail there was a BIG steamy pile of bear poo. So we stopped IMMEDIATELY and headed back out of the forest and across the street to the beach. YIKES!
“I don’t wanna call myself an artist but I’m someone that likes to have context in my work,” says Wu. “I like to have my work be more than about the clothes. I want my fashion shows to be an experience.”
And I really n truly do hope that this one is leaving you with a smile or two!xx
When I came home with my biopsy results showing colonization and classic histological damage to my stomach, Adrienne suggested it was time to treat myself. I had a successful infection, I had proved my point. Read more>>
However, it gets a bit serious when state bodies start believing such nonsense without question, and instigate quite absurd illiberal policy, as happened in 2007.
For your chance to win BLOG CANDY, (a set that will be released NEXT month), visit and comment on each of the following design team members' blogs on August 10, 11, 12, and 13, 2010. On Saturday, (August 14, 2010), a winner will be chosen FOR EACH DAY from those participants who visited all the blogs listed for that day. (There will be four different winners, one winner for each day.)
It’s perhaps a challenge that is faced most acutely by established and highly successful authors. They have succeeded by writing a particular kind of story, so there is a temptation to keep writing it. The temptation is all the greater when a series enjoys commercial success. Those novelists whom I admire most are those who have the courage to keep trying something new, even within the apparent
The National Day of Prayer is an annual observance held on the first Thursday of May, inviting people of all faiths to pray for the nation. It was created in 1952 by a joint resolution of the United States Congress, and signed into law by President Harry S. Truman. On January 25, 1988, President Ronald Reagan signed into law the designation of the first Thursday in May as the annual observance for the National Day of Prayer.
None of that exists inside anymore. What’s left is full acceptance of what is without personalization, judgement, or criticism. I got my tires rotated and I cleaned my fridge out today! Wow! I searched for the blessings in today. I always search for blessings in everything. I trust that if I don’t see the blessing than I need to change my inner sight. I need to change the way I’m looking to find the blessing. And, today, really wasn’t that bad. I know it would have been BAD to the me not too long ago. Now, I see things aren’t that big of a deal if you just move with the moment.
I love it when teens stand up for what they believe in, when they fight injustice, when they feel they have a voice because THEY DO. When it’s something they care about, something that’s important to them, something they BELIEVE in, a passion that extends beyond thirty seconds, there are some teens, many teens who will go for the win, or die trying.
Oh, and P.S. she may be involved in my giveaway coming up in the next 2 weeks!!!
my in-laws,
Admired and beautiful,
Anyway, there is a lot of competition for these things, even at our little charter school. The girls had already gotten mean and catty about the campaigning.
“But he was pierced for our transgressions, he was crushed for our iniquities; the punishment that brought us peace was upon him, and by his wounds we are healed.” (Isaiah 53:5)
Our DT always like to take the month of December off to celebrate the Holidays with our family and friends.
Yammering on about how amazing I am makes me feel a little ill. But if I don’t stake my claim, every single one of my loud-mouthed competitors will.
Hello again, coming back to you after such a long time to give such a short blog post! And I updated my theme as well. I have to learn some CSS and start creating my own themes… most of these free WordPress themes are so badly-designed!
2. Readers’ Favorite Awards
6) J. C. PENNEY "SPIRIT OF CHRISTMAS"
In the Land of Hatchy Milatchy.
(Please note we will reply asap as soon as all winner are intouch!)
The bass player received the most publicity in his career when Dan Ackroyd and John Belushi picked him to play in The Blues Brothers. He also appeared in the sequel Blues Brother 2000.
-Sunday we started the day off at church. Then I decided it was a good day to clean out Keating's dresser to get ready for Archer's room, cleaned out our basement freezer, hung a little art work, washed more baby clothes, painted a bed for my niece, revamped our mantle for Spring, cleaned out Keating's closet and I'm sure there is more I am forgetting. I'm not sure if this is me nesting or just taking advantage of the amazing weather we have had, either way I am feeling it today and can hardly walk. Pregnancy is hard work and I am happy to be in the end stretch!
Finally the Pessah is over, as well as the immediate Shabbat following. Don’t get me wrong, I enjoy both, but in the end you just want to return to normal, especially after two days not having any connection to the world around you.
Freddie Mac borrowers who refinanced reduced interest rates by 27% in the first quarter, a high in the 27-year history of the government-sponsored enterprise’s analysis.
Being a big fan of aubergine, the baingan was a big hit. Smokey and delicately spiced with a luxurious texture that was so so pleasing to eat, I loved it. And the pigeon was a nice surprise too as I've never had game presented like this before. Very tender and again light with aromatic spice flavours rather than the fiery heat I normally associate with curries, mind you Uncle Ji did criticise the English interpretation that Indian food should be packed with chillies. The homemade paneer was very good too, rich and creamy whereas the rice was plain and simple and all the better for it given the combinations of flavours going on. There was one duff note though I am afraid which was the dhal chutney, compared to the rest of the plate it was rather bland and felt like it needed something else for some extra oomph. I normally love coriander but the last minute addition to this chutney left it all tasting rather.....soapy? Sorry Uncle Ji but otherwise, a splendid meal.
So, first I scrubbed everything down with TSP, let them bake in yesterday's hot sun, then got to work last night.
The state liquor store. The Europeans go wild buying the inexpensive liquor.
Something American was needed. Something we had really missed. I remembered we bought a bag of chocolate chips when we were in Georgetown in January. Cookies! How perfect?? Some of you know, my favorite thing in life is chocolate chip cookies. Yum!
We stopped in a village called Dunakiliti for a mid-morning coffee. Our first stop in Hungary and I have to admit that it felt a lttle strange to be somewhere where you had no notion of the language. Hungary is not that different from Germany and Austria, just enough to be a little bit exciting.
***This is a guest review by a very talented writer, and my friend, Jenn. I hope you all enjoy her way with words as much as I, hopefully, we will have more guest posts by her in the future. Be sure to leave a comment about how much you love her :)***
The Heavenly Hash Egg is a recent discovery for me. They get sent to my office from one of our remote workers in Texas. What this thing consists of is a fluffy marshmallowy goo, laced with almonds (big and small), and covered in chocolate. If the StayPuft Marshmallow Man picked his nose, this is what would be at the end of his finger when he pulled it out. My only complaint is that this thing falls apart easily, making an oogie mess at times. But the chocolate has a nice snap to it with serious goo in the center. The almonds set it off. The only thing that would make this thing better is if they actually put hash in it. Then again, that would probably be a waste of hash.
-Aren't you cold in that little dress?
I have two more Xmas tress on the front porch, one in bay window and one in the front porch. One more, the foyer….. I started a collecting ornaments for a Kwanzaa/Ethnic theme. I have been working on this idea for the at lease 13-years. Maybe next year?
From the 1st year of Highschool (9th grade) I became a trainee in SM Entertainment. Honestly, everyone knew about this (that he became a trainee), I was still a little shy.
I turn up at TFFKAML’s house, hoping to lose myself and my plastic container of slightly stale looking chocolate rice crispie cakes (the Co-Op’s selection is a bit depleted) among the crowd of genteel and elegant ladies who are each carrying magnificent home-baked contributions.
Last weekend Billy and I went back to Chicago and we went to the Black Diamond Charity’s 2nd annual event that my mom is in charge of. Last year, they raised around $8,000. This year it was closer to $16,000. My mom has done an amazing job and we hope it keeps doubling each year!
Like the Prima-flowers, its gorgeous, right?
Congas – Frankie Malabe
(So I stay on topic about 77% of the time. That's probably higher than in real life, right?)
Being an American in Japan has its advantages. Many people will complain about the challenges of getting around and living a daily life with the language barrier and being such an outsider. I kind of enjoy some of those things. I live for a challenge and I've always been very independent.
I think this has more to do with history than advertising, just a thought..
Mulligatawny In A Wrap & Veggie Wrap - February 4
Yorke
1 prevails
I am worried by the number of lawyers who tell me that volumes of work and levels of profitability will normalize once the recession is over. The question is whether a rising economic tide will lift all boats. The problem is threefold. First, many law firms have cut their fees in order to keep work levels up and it will not be easy for them to raise those rates again if and when the tide turns. I hear of commercial property clients who have managed to negotiate fixed fee decreases of at least 40% over the last two years; those clients will refuse to see those rates go back to 2007 levels. The second issue here is that in many areas of commercial and property law, there is now a large oversupply of lawyers. This is already giving rise to intense competition for available work. It is likely to be some time before the supply-demand pendulum swings back. The third problem is that the demand for legal services often lags some way behind any upswing. I fear therefore that better economic times – whenever they come – will take a long time to benefit law firms in general and will come too late to rescue many ailing firms or practice groups
Apparently, I'm not a late-onset schizophrenic who gave away her home & most of her belongings while psychotic, but a person offering up a counterfeit tale for some form of attention. If so, can you come over & help me find the keys to my house? Cause I really miss my home. These women didn't attack me, I allow myself to be hurt too easily.
There are presently 15 recycling programs established in the hotel that diverts up to 80-85% of its total waste from being sent to local landfills. Cardboard, printing paper, light bulbs, guestroom amenities, batteries, toner cartridges, aerosol cans, food waste, yard waste, and kitchen deep fry oil have all been included in the recycling process. The food waste, for example, goes from the hotel’s compactor to a material recovery facility where it is separated and turned into organic compost. In paper and food waste alone the hotel’s efforts saved 724 trees and did not take up 198 cubic yards of landfill space.
12. Introduction to Parking
The teeth like a forest to the
I was really pleased with the flavor of this cake, the buttercream is like silk but it absolutely must be at room temp when served. There is a boatload of butter in it (3 sticks!) and if it is even a little cold it hardens up.
My manuscript is somewhere over the U.S. today.
I’m not sure if anyone noticed that my site went dark on Wednesday, but I am sure that you noticed the blackout on other sites around the internet that day and I am sure by now you have heard of SOPA (Stop Online Piracy Act) and PIPA (Protect Intellectual Property Act) which have caused such an uproar in the online community and among tech companies in recent months. As of right now both bills have been shelved and there is no scheduled vote for either. The remaining Republican candidates came out against the bills as they began their campaign for South Carolina this week (big surprise, you say what will get you elected) and the White House made a statement that was mildly against these bills (in their current form).
and today, 10 years later, he still has me.
-heat the oil in a large skilley over medium-high heat. Add the celery and cook, tossing, for 2 minutes. Add the snow peas and chili pepper and cook, tossing, until the veggies are just tender, about 2 minutes more.
And this second batch says, nope, there is no supreme being, it’s just us projecting our beliefs onto one another until we are all at each others’ throats:
In my mind this online journal gives me a chance to share a typical family that has had our minds and hearts opened by a little boy with an extra chromosome. We didn't ask for a child with Down syndrome nor did we choose it we simply asked God for the gift of a child and HE knew best what we needed. Little did we know that we needed Riley to complete our family.
It spiraled from there.
“Doc? I thought I told you about that already?”
The men’s families had campaigned for an inquest to be held for more than 20 years.
Hello Again,
The winner of the $25 GC to Turtle Soup Kids is Ed S.
The event was the Great and Holy Friday Procession, part of the Greek Orthodox Holy Week services.
Take for an example one of the greatest film directors that had ever lived, Alfred Hitchcock and his 1936 film Sabotage. Hitchcock considered the film one of the greatest mistakes of his career. Hitchcock later said that if you work up an audience’s nerves to a certain degree that the bomb should never go off, or the audience will turn on the film and you. White knuckle suspense will suddenly turn to bitter resentment. In Sabotage the bomb went off. It was a mistake that Hitchcock never made again as he entered the prime of his career, the 1940′s and 50′s. In 1937, he may have wished he could go back and fix that mistake, but it was too late at that point. So he used that lesson to make him a better filmmaker, going to create the masterpieces of his career. None of which were artistic endeavors, all were commercial films made for general consumption.
an illusion meant to confuse by Mother Nature;
I attended the AGM today, as I do every year, as a BAE shareholder. Before you get worried about my buying shares in arms companies, I own only one share. Like many others, I own it so that I can turn up and hold the company to account for its arms sales, its corruption and its damage to Britain’s democracy and economy.
-Our financial system is based on toxifying the planet with no serious incentives to be a good steward of the planet…. this is because our leaders worship satan and not God.
02 Whiskey Man 03:44
So, to all the boys down at Old World Brewery, thanks and keep the beer coming.
I think every blogger enjoys comments, and I'm no exception. But for me, blogging has become a way for me to write for an audience, even if I never hear from my audience. My struggle is not the lack of comments, it's the lack good ideas.
This blogger does not do twitter, but if he did, he would have tweeted an expletive at approx 15:45 gmt.
Deadline for submission is May 6, 2012. The cost of submission is $30 by April 22 and $40 by May 6. A good incentive to apply early.
A Birthday card for our Godson. I'm sure he'll love it,he's just like his uncle,loves cars and toys. He'll be 10 already,time flies by doesn't it.
POP/Transfers
Ever had the desire to be different? I have heard it and even said it
I am just back from Buffalo where I celebrated Thanksgiving, (early) family Christmas, my Father's birthday, and the birthdays of my twin nieces. It was a whirlwind trip but SO much fun! I was able to do a lot of baking for my family and loved every second of it. I could use a bit of a rest now. However, in a few hours I will be boarding a plane to India. I'll be traveling around with my husband for two weeks, so I won't be baking or posting anything new for awhile. The trip should be exciting, I'm sure, but I'm already looking forward to coming home and baking for Christmas!
Often it is best to be silent and listen. Listen more talk less.
If you plan on regularly using colloidal silver then you should consider the benefits of making your own. Being able to produce your own colloidal silver will allow you to cut down on how much you spend every month.
The pearls of
Listening to: Rilo Kiley's The Execution of All Things. Every single spring I feel like I blog about this but for good reason. The entire album reminds me so much of the warm months ahead and all things summer. It's great from beginning to end and it makes me so happy to listen to it, especially right around this time of the year when I am looking forward to April, May and beyond.
The lesson of Nehemiah and his dealing with things and people recently hit close to home in my personal life. I am in the process of building a publishing business so I am able to do what God has gifted me to do. My desire is to help members of the Body of Christ publish their books, at an affordable price, for the furtherance of the Gospel. On New Year’s Day 2012, I sought the Lord about my desire to help Christians publish their books, and I believe He inspired in me the idea to have 40 publishing clients between now and 2017. I wrote a five-year plan and was on my way to fulfilling it, because last April, a young woman sought me out for my help. She was the first of my 40 clients, and we completed close to 90 percent of the process of having her book in her hand. However, in February, she changed her mind about a May deadline we had agreed upon. I said, “Okay, Lord. She is Your child, and I am Your child. What does all this mean?” The young woman’s postponing her plans meant deferred finances — or “things” — for me.
Mortgage lenders and Insurers are looking for you to have a credit score over 620 for them to look at helping with the mortgage application. Some mortgage products may need you to be above the 680 mark.
I think you have to base the answer to your question on what you know about your grandmother. Is she living solely on social security and $200 is a lot for her? Or do you think she’s just not aware that the wedding dress you want costs more?
Spandau Ballet
Conan: Conan.
Planning for the ISS makes a huge difference. The @VirtualAstro twitter account is a good place to start, there’s a wealth of info for every pass from that particular source. The website, www.heavens-above.com is also good for working out the directions, altitude and brightness of the ISS for any given pass. The free astro programme, Stellarium for Mac or PC is also very helpful, it’ll show you the exact path the ISS will take and from this you can work out in relation to the planets where it’ll be which makes planning a lot easier. The iPhone app StarWalk also allows you to do this.
I am not sure when I will be posting again, hopefully soon. I live in Northern Alabama and our whole region was rocked by Tornadoes and severe weather yesterday. The whole region is without electricity, gasoline is scarce, stores are closed so groceries are hard to find but we do still have water so that is a good thing.
walking in his steps of faith. You’re affirming yourself as a child of faith
they said i’m too ideal. following the rules. but in reality, we all should have rules to live by. may it be religion, personal belief. for me it is my dream for a happy family.
An elevated blood sugar puts Laurie at risk for developing diabetes as well as AGE damage to her body. The good news is that her tingling greatly improved with a Vitamin B complex supplement. AGEs caused by elevated blood sugar inflicted the nerve damage contributing to the tingling in her feet. Additionally, she is now aware of the dangers of elevated AGEs. Now, she can choose to eat healthier so she can be as young on the inside of her body as she appears on the outside.
This vintage metal was stand is so great ~ I love it! However, I have never been able to find a spot in the house for it. Perhaps if I had a little cottage out back, or a summer house, it could find a forever home. Alas, none of those here, so it has been relegated to the basement for about a year now.
Bloggers have a genuine chance here to contribute to my input on the working party on a subject that has already caused a lot of debate within this blog. I hope that as many of you as possible take it up.
Commentators have noted that Righthaven may be withering on the vine. It is being attacked from all angles, the legal theories that form the basis of their stable of cases has been completely undermined, and they have not filed any new lawsuits recently.
Always. I know I’m doing a good job when I have terrible nightmares about my characters.
an irresistable smile of appreciation
Put the shortening in the bowl with the butter and turn on the mixer to medium, beating them together until they are well blended.
Similar for the new BK Bridge park, great angles on the Bridge towers. I was also excited to see some serious destro-porn in the form of the old National Building in various stages of destruction.
Today, at work, I was working furiously to meet some frighteningly upcoming deadlines; and, as is the way of things, I received a phone call from my daughter's school.
I stayed awake all night long. The next day, my mom asked me why I looked so tired. I just burst into tears. I didn’t rat out CBF, but I never watched another horror movie with her again. I also didn’t sleep for a month.
Kick the junk food habit. Oh boy. Kevin and I are major junk food addicts. For real. Just this week we've spent an embarrassing amount of money on convenience store junk food (even though we set the goal, um, Sunday). I think this is because we're tired and chips and soda are quick pick-me-ups, but it doesn't help us in the end. It's going to be a tough thing to really achieve for us, but replacing processed junk food with healthier alternatives will be SO good for us.
Stamps - Card Chatter - Sympathy
One of the reasons I enjoy collaborating with Ellen Weber is she draws from natural wit daily. To see her humorous flashes, check out Dinner Blew Up -- But Not the Deal and you can quickly see how she has ability to laugh at herself, no matter what. Once when presenting in Puerto Rico, we stayed in a hotel hosting the Miss Universe Pageant. One morning Ellen was not feeling well so was advised to see the doctor who was on call for contestants. When Ellen's named was called to see the physician, she tripped on a floodlight wire and fell as she walked to the door. In front of all the contestants waiting there. She experienced one of the most gregarious belly laughs I have ever witnessed. Ellen's gifts of wit and banter work well for her as she makes business deals or just engages others as she networks. If a group we're working with loses steam, Ellen jump-starts the action with a well-timed joke. Ever tried it?
While child proofing needs to happen, don’t freak out about it on the first day home. Relax, enjoy some time with your new child without the judgmental eyes of the pediatric nurses on you all the time. You have time to fix your home to make it survivable. And look on the bright side, in a mere 18 years you can kick that kid out and move your home into Stage 5, empty nest. You might even be able to bring back your life sized storm trooper.
2012 Rules
The concrete jungle where dreams are made, there's nothing you can't do... These streets will make you feel brand new, big lights will inspire you...
Jim and I headed out ASAP because we wanted to make it to Quorikancha before it closed. Cuzco is such an interesting mix of old Incan streets and buildings with colonial Spanish and modern architecture alike all on top of it, giving it an almost European feel. Cuzco is sort of unique in that it was still occupied by the Incas (they hadn't abandoned it) at the time of Pizarro's conquest with the conquistadores from Spain. Quorikancha is no exception, as it is basically a Spanish cathedral built upon the Incan temple that the kings are rumored to have both frequented and, at one time, been buried in. All of the Incan artifacts (including the mummies of the kings) are now long gone with the conquistadores, but the building is now quite beautiful and serves as both a church and a museum. It sits up on a hill in the back, and Jim and I spent some time taking in the view of the town below and the mountains behind around sunset. It was quite stunning and relaxing.
Along with spreading anti-bullying messages in schools, Kiran is also an advocate for the Red Cross program, speaking at province-wide educator conferences and local school boards to encourage more schools to implement RespectED programming.
That Congress may again fall to pass a valid appropriations act is a remote possibility, for under the circumstances it fully realizes its great responsibility of saving the nation from breaking down; and furthermore, the President in the exercise of his constitutional powers may, if he so desires, compel Congress to remain in special session till it approves the legislative measures most needed by the country.
There is a new store that opened in the mall called Charming Charlie, I've been promising them a trip there to buy something if they can keep up with their chores and earn their own money to buy something.
We got into town and was 20 seconds from the hospital door when all the sudden there were lights and sirens on our tail. Hubby really wasn't speeding too badly... I even thought it was an ambulance going into the hospital. But then realized it was a cop. He even had his spot light on us and the really urgent siren sound on. Since we were turning in to the hospital ER hubby kept going another second to get me to the door. The town cop got out and was clearly irate that we didn't stop immediately for him and we were going if I can remember correctly about 8 mph over. Hubby told him my water broke and he just wanted me to get to the hospital. Hubby showed him his badge (he's a federal officer) and said 'look I was just trying to get my wife to the hospital, her water broke, this is my first baby, I don't know what's going on.' But the cop insisted on being a mega jerk saying well you should have stopped for me right away (we were literally turning into the parking lot). Hubby and him argued back and forth a few times and at this point I was nearly in tears I told hubby to just stop talking. UM hello I was in labor, write us a ticket or leave! Finally the cop glanced in at me the got in his car and sped off furiously. We got out and with soaked towels still wrapped around my bottom I waddled into the ER. The whole time I was thinking this is like out of a movie scene...is this really happening? Never did I think I would go into labor before my due date, have my water break on it's own, or get pulled over on the way to the hospital.
If none of the above is willing and able, Elton should consider the radical option of hiring one of my females. Any of them would do a grand job of nursing baby Zachary into a fine little Tarzan. The only problem I foresee is that never having lived amongst humans they are entirely lacking in social graces. Could the genteel residents of Windsor get used to a female gorilla prowling through their public spaces, groping any taut behinds that took her fancy? For the sake of Elton’s family, I hope they can learn to put up with it.
I wrote about our chickens last fall when we first got them. I guess I didn't tell an important story that leads up to recent events.
allow this to happen to His Beloved Son?
The Sunday before New Beginnings I had all the classes set Goals for the Year. I had them displayed at New Beginnings and talked a little about them. We have this hanging in our YW room every Sunday to remind them to work on their goals!
I hope your body lets you have a full season this year - if anyone deserves it, it's you. Thanks for wearing the 'D' with pride and professionalism.
Pour the cream into a medium saucepan and heat the cream over high heat until it just begins to boil. Turn off the heat and add the vanilla and butter, whisking until it melts.
UMNO is desperate
Boil milk in a pan on low flame. Boil it for a hour till it thickens. Remove from flame. Take out the cream which must have accumulated on top of milk and keep aside in a bowl. Add sugar to the milk. Cool the milk completely.
Anyway, I am waffling, it is a Monday, first day of the school week after half term, which means around 5 weeks to go until Easter and I have a few birthdays and events in that time span. Watch this space…
The particular pattern above tells you a little about the designer on the flap (not all of the Couturier patterns seem to do that- the only other ones I’ve across are for Emilio Pucci):
Good evening all, hope the week is treating you well.
One of the keys to attracting this group, and keeping them happy (and showing up for work) is our flexible scheduling program that allows them to pick the hours they want to work. That way they have plenty of time for all of their academic and extracurricular activities – they work to live; they don’t live to work. But I ask you: would you really want an employee who doesn’t care about academics or doesn’t do anything but work?
“Research has found that men’s and women’s perceptions of the opposite gender’s ideal are incorrect. Men on average prefer women two sizes larger and women prefer a more natural look in men,” says Dr. Zubcevic.
The human animal is Love alive:
a) be taken from an album released in 2009; or
Voice Call: a razor-sharp whit. Reproduction, a tough, climbing down burrrk (or rasp) or whay-burg. Beginning song: recurring whit paperwork, vibrato whistles, burrrk paperwork, and other complicated words.
Yet the chattering classes criticized Obama for "taking a victory lap," even going so far as to try and swift boat him. It hasn't worked yet, as Obama's been careful to point out that the SEALS did the work, but as President he was the one who ordered the hit.
Did this person ever wonder why large companies and corporations hire entire teams of intellectual property lawyers to defend against copyright theft?
Purts me in mind of the old Lyndon Johnson 'I want to make him deny it' story. Detail here, but it includes a rude word and a reference to an illegal, not to say unhygienic, sexual practice.
His life long partner and collaborator, wife jean Claude, died in 2009. They were fated to be together, having been born on the same day.
Liars: Sailing to Byzantium
We walked from the North Bridge Road end on Arab Street to the Beach Road and spotted this Swedish Cafe and Bistro, Fika, in the corner of Arab Street and Beach Road, that looked adorable. I could not help peeking in. The interior looked absolutely adorable and if we were walking around much earlier during the day, I would’ve had some tea and snack there or if I ever go back to visit Arab Street in Singapore, I will definitely try to Fika. Fika was packed with the customers I assumed were local which is always a good sign and I was very tempted, but we saved our empty stomach for Middle Eastern Food.
To be honest I am struggling a bit with this retirement game. Things did not get off to a very good start with my mother dying just before I finished worked and husband is still at home cluttering up the cottage. I was pleasantly surprised by the number of cards and letters that I received from friends and family, in response to my mother's death. My mother's generation don't do e-mail and I have had to respond the old fashioned way. Now, I have almost got the spare bedroom clear of my mother's clothes. Most have been distributed to the local charity shops, but before I was able to do that I had to remove the name tapes from them. It just took a couple of snips to remove the name tapes that I had sewn in, but the ones ironed in by the home were a different matter. It was as if they had been set in concrete. I had to resort to using a marker pen to black out her name. Then there was the issue of what to do with Mum's ashes. The undertaker had brought them round and dumped them in the garage next to the ashes from our log fire, which we spread around our roses. I found the idea of having her ashes in the cottage a bit spooky and was not sure what to do with them. Thankfully my brother collected them a few days later. He has plans to scatter them down in Devon.
I spent the last weekend in Singapore at Jenny Sun Photography workshop. Really enjoyed being a participant. Jenny was great in sharing and showing us how she does things, her thought processes, successes and struggles. I left the workshop encouraged and refreshed =)
As I said, this place was heaving with natives, all buying their trees and carting them away. But why were they buying them in the 1st week of December when the tradition here is to put up the tree on Christmas Eve (needless to say this is why our tree is up early - standing proudly in the front window for all those passers by looking up and staring through the windows (that'll be everyone walking past then) to see and think to themselves 'bloody Ausländers*') I put this question to my tame German today (that'll be Muna my German teacher) and she says that everyone buys their trees early ('cos if you leave it too late then all the good ones are gone...well that's a self-fulfilling thingy then) and then they leave them outside in the garden until December 24th - this would be presuming that none of these early buyers have male dogs then.
It hides our cheeks and shades our eyes--
I’ve learned … That the best classroom in the world is at the feet of an elderly person.
Scrapbook background papers, embellishments
“Come in” Osbourne said. He was sat at his desk surrounded by paperwork when they walked in but as soon as he saw them he stood up and motioned to the chairs in front of his desk. “Welcome back boys, have a seat.”
What: Floor talk with Conor Ashleigh and Robert McFarlane
I don't want to finish this post without saying how brilliant it is that she compares being love to being all hopped up on cocaine or something. Or withdrawal? I don't know. I've never done drugs, but something about needing a fix and being addicted just sounds a lot like love. That and banging your head against a wall.
So my mother and I met the reporter and photographer at one of my favorite places to sit down and have tea, a co-op health food store and cafe. And, you know, we talked about unschooling! And also had a lengthy photo shoot. Both the photographer and the journalist were very nice, and though as soon as we left I started thinking of things I wish I'd said, or said differently, I was still happy with how it went.
Or believe the propaganda of your local feathered LSD crack-head who tells you that all people emigrating from South Africa are racist supremacists. Racist supremacists with the kind of advanced education and skills necessary to make a success in countries where even being politically incorrect isn’t tolerated, let alone racism. Imagine that.
10. Does the idea of getting the wrinkles that come with the maturing process bother you?
That henceforth all of us united be,
There was a temporary exhibition of contemporary Fine Art, constructed around private collectors and their collections, A Private Affair. Below are works by Lisa Milroy, Andrew Bracey and Gordon Cheung.
I covered the lid in papers and rolled a die cut that I had distressed with Walnut Stain Distress ink. The text says "A gift for you" in Swedish. The leaf has been cut out with a Tim Holtz die, using papers from the Waiting For Santa Part II collection. The leaf and the flowers have been distressed with Walnut Stain as well.
Species: Pink (Coho has sugar added)
That's the gist of what I told my publisher's sales force when I had to present the book to them a couple of weeks ago. It wasn't easy - I had to follow a debut novelist whose book is already tipped for great things and is in discussions about movie rights - and Rastamouse.
3) The people respond to God in a spirit of unity.
*Buy a planner calendar and start writing in all the wonderful free events your community sponsors and you may realize that you don't have time for it all, let alone for activities that cost a bundle. In our community, we have an annual Daffodil Festival, a chalk drawing competition, a quilting expo, a crafting fair, a renaissance faire, several reenacting events (one revolutionary, one civil war), car shows, garden week, fishing competitions, a county fair with the usual contests, a Greek festival, and much more. Within an hours drive are a strawberry festival, a waterman's festival, a pirate festival, a harborfest, an oyster festival, art shows, music in the park, movies outdoors on a big screen, craft shows, a children's fair, a peanut festival, and much, much more (especially in the summer and around holidays).
You are the snow,
I have got to stop letting the circumstances (which would make your ears bleed if I told them to you) control my hope, and start overcoming. Stop jumping back and forth between doubt and belief. God doesn’t want me doing that.
Benjamin Franklin once said, “The only things certain in life are death and taxes.” The author of the book of Hebrews wrote, “It is appointed for men to die once …” James also wrote that “like flowering grass, (the rich man) will pass away.”
The bad news is that my pot leeks just haven't done at all well this year.They've been given exactly the same treatment as last year but just haven't responded the same. I've not quite given up on them, and have planted out just the 5 strongest plants. I'm fairly convinced that the eratic weather conditions have been a major factor in the poor performance of many of my plants this Spring, especially the wildly fluctuating temperatures.
The morcilla and apple slaw on toast is the only disappointment, the blood sausage sliced a little too meagerly and over-seared so the delicate flavour and texture has been lost. The apple slaw is swaddled in mayonnaise so it's more heavy than refreshing.
The mass signing tonight was precisely that: a MASSIVE signing. The Regency ballroom was very hot and stuffy. I spent that three hour block holding down real estate in the bar. (What? I was thirsty, and besides--how was I going to pick which author's books to get signed? Besides Gini, of course.) After that, we went to a couple of small press parties. We hung out for a while with the folks from EDGE--all very nice and lots of fun--and then went on to the Chi-Zine party, where I got to get a good look at the really outstanding books they're putting out as well as pulling out bottles of beer from the tub. Pretty darn cool.
I have another of my samples to show you today which is actually a Just Inklined Digi sheet sample that I made before Christmas. These sheets are 4 digi images printed onto smooth white card which makes them ideal for promarkers and copics etc. There are many sheets to choose from and they are only 59p per sheet! This particular sheet is available here. I have coloured the image in with my promarkers.
at your ankles.
No changes may be made that constitute a burden to the well-being of the horse, either physically or mentally. If you accept riding in hyperflexion as a permissible training method, you legitimize aggressive riding. We protest that in the strongest possible terms!
Maybe if I get to go on the trip again with the other twin I wall take some more photos.
Ohhhhhh oh oh... and guess what? Have you noticed yet that our sweet Vicki is back, and sharing her beautiful creativity with all of us again? Welcome Back Vicki, we've missed you!
“They like you,” she said. “Deb told me she thinks I did good.”
game changer.
Their objective would be full employment.
The action by members of the police force, apparently acting on orders, or “arahan dari atas”, was taken directly against journalists engaged in carrying out their duties and clearly aimed at preventing journalists from reporting accurately on events that they witnessed, and in several cases to specifically prevent them from reporting on police action to disperse the rally.
Food wise its been hit and miss. I need to write the food down. It keeps me on track and focused as does writing blog posts. I accept that realistically no one is going to write down what they eat on a day to day basis but for the purposes of losing weight its essential. A pain but an essential pain. When I write my food diary properly I lose weight in that week. I feel I've wasted a week, no, I have wasted a week. I doubt I'll lose on Monday.
I blogged on this a while back that there are actually fewer humans and it has been longer since we went to the bottom of the deepest ocean on earth than man going to the moon! Here is a great summary by the BBC on the current challengers in the race to the bottom of the ocean. Doesn't that sound like a Jules Verne type novel/film with Victorian adventurers and lots of steam pipes hissing and scary previously unseen monsters of the deep attacking you... oh only me then
The ROH orchestra, lead by Andrew Davis, seemed tentative to begin with, but warmed up throughout and gave a very good performance of this score. I wanted a bit more warmth and body sometimes, and occasionally Davis' conducting felt closer to efficient rather than inspired, but the overall result was emotionally arresting and true to the spirit of the score.
As requested by a pre-wedding broadcast over the park’s loudspeaker, not one engine was revved during the ceremony.
From the Gītā we learn that even after the destruction of the body, the ātmā, or the soul, is not destroyed; he is always the same, always new and fresh. Fire cannot burn him, water cannot dissolve him, the air cannot dry him up, and the sword cannot kill him. He is everlasting and eternal, and this is also confirmed in the Śrīmad-Bhāgavatam (10.84.13):
Geoff said: "In my final year I happened to meet a young couple, brother and sister, while at a party - they lived in Eugina Road with their divorced mother. We all became friends and I took to visiting frequently. As I always have done, I took photographs. The local pub, The Apples and Pears, had a very definite atmosphere, and these pictures were the start of me shooting more seriously.
Heck, even I can't figure out all the buttons!
And since we didn’t generate this migration with dbm-gorm-diff with the -add option, a reference to this file also needs to be added to the master changelist. So add a line like the following to the end of grails-app/migrations/changelog.groovy:
show me
Initially, this blog was actually going to be a sort-of response to the blog "1000 Awesome Things." I figured I'd dream up a lot of things that aren't life-altering things to make you unhappy, but just sort-of suck. Friendly pessimism, I guess. I didn't have enough of those, though. I had to really look to find them. As contrary as it seems, the same person that is almost constantly tinged with sadness is also an almost blindingly shiny optimist that almost always sees the good of life and the happiness that exists there. A lot of it, clearly, bound up in popular culture, whether it be modern or nostalgic.
What in the world is "Creole Wienie"?
Capers, Chick Peas, Almonds, Fresh Herbs &
The alarm draws the attention of several guards, one of whom Hex shoots in the face and then Jonah's path is blocked by a force-field across a doorway (it appears to be red lightning to Jonah.) Another guard rounds the corner and Jonah grabs him and flips him into the force-field.
I really probably shouldn’t write, or publish, this post.
It's bad enough that those of us who love genre fiction already feel like the poor stepchild of literature. Now YA literature is ground into the dirt.
somewhere else at a cheaper rate.
I know that God is the God of the second chances but this was my moment. To see beyond my embarrassment and open my heart. And I didn't.
like wildflowers they spring up and blossom,
Today we visited our old church. Bittersweet it was. I also realized on our way "home" this is where I am now and I need to embrace it and move forward.
I've let out a lot of my personal life here lately. Maybe more than I should have...maybe just exactly the amount I needed too. I read back, and there are moments I think I may have made a mistake putting all of that out into the world...then, I am reminded that this is all about my healing, and I have been fortunate to have received a tremendous amount of love and support. For that, I think it's been worth the 'exposure'.
Apparently Oregon has a poet laureate although, in the words of Michael Caine, not a lot of people know that. It was a a surprise to learn states as well as countries could have poet laureates, although I can't imagine the idea catching on in places like Alabama, for instance. I could be wrong.
Below is a chart showing the 4 week moving average of all equity fund flows (based on data from Lipper FMI). The current data is the worst showing since September 2010.
Four Novels You Wish You Were Reading for the First Time
zebra striped luggage, kandee
This fits perfectly in my “live for today” mindset!!! I can’t wait to find out what the real story is here….like the risks and all that other boring stuff. Fellow Boomer: there’s also a risk to doing nothing.
Slice Field Roast Apple Sage Sausage. In a skillet over medium heat, heat 1 Tbsp olive oil and add Apple Sage Sausage. Cook sausage browning on both sides, 4-5 minutes. Remove from pan and set aside.
I will not stop saying that for the next four years.
_____ITS FUNNY HOW ALL TRUST GOES AWAY WHEN YOU CAN'T FIND THE REMOTE. "ARE YOU SITTING ON IT" "NO" "STAND UP"
Then came the full body massage (again, modesty has no place) and unanticipated nutritional pep talk. I need to eat "much, much, much more bread," according to my masseuse who found my corps wanting in the poundage department. What's more, I needed to learn to r e l a x. When I replied that in fact, that's precisely why I was getting a massage, she sniffed and stated that wasn't sufficient. Prescription medication for relaxation was deemed necessary. Oh, and extra Vitamin B.
The weeks really do just fly by here. Once it gets to Wednesday morning it’s like a slip-slide almost, wheeee, and then it’s suddenly Friday again.
Active alcoholics are idiots, no matter what they may tell you to the contrary. I may still be a dimwit, but I am not that kind of moron.
When it gets to the reception, food and music are going to be a super important part of the day for us. We love food and we love good music. So, we are planning a bit of a Mexican-Australian mash up. Perhaps some ceviche, some tacos, or some delicious tostaditas – one of our favourite dishes from the best Mexican restaurant in Australia at the moment, Mamacitas.
No offense but your kids are doing it wrong. I’m just saying.
So because of this squaring of capitalism with parliamentary democracy, and the squaring of capitalism with fascism, thus also the squaring of parliamentary democracy with fascism, the SWP is highly suspicious of something both Stalinists and Trots call ‘social fascism’ – that is, fascism that portrays itself - or even is - also ‘social’ in nature. But if capitalism can easily turn into fascism, and thus liberal democracy can easily turn to/into fascism, then ‘socialism fascism’, social democracy or parliamentary democracy, is also the same phenomenon as fascism itself. Thus fascism is
scalloped card blank
...I am however wondering why the psychotic blame-shifters at the Times are claiming that Dominique Strauss Kahn was set up by Sarkozy's people.
I needn't have worried.
Totes... but maybe in cobalt blue or sunshine yellow... I need to retire the black bag for a season...
"the Campaign is a way to link those of us in the writing community together with the aim of helping to build our online platforms. The Campaigners are all bloggers in a similar position, who genuinely want to pay it forward, make connections and friends within the writing community, and help build each others' online platforms while at the same time building theirs."
Even though the following examples are of people with disabilities who have broken the prejudice barrier to succeed, thrive, and even become famous, people with disabilities who are not famous can also hold competitive jobs, make friends, get married, live great lives, and have the love and respect of others.
We are also still selling t-shirts through Adoption Bug and gift cards ($50 gift cards for only $20! What a steal!) for restaurants through a fundraiser with Facebook and Restaurant.com. We have links to both of these places on the right side of this blog and right up top.
As you know, each Monday and Friday the La-La Land Crafts design team aim to bring you a new inspirational post based on a chosen theme - this week our theme is
This doesn’t mean, of course, that we have only a hope of future joys—we can be full of joy here and now even in our trials and troubles. Taken in the right spirit these very things will give us patient endurance; this in turn will develop a mature character, and a character of this sort produces a steady hope, a hope that will never disappoint us.
Certainly most of these charges are valid and damning. And it would make a good argument against against Newt Gingrich…until you see the part where it says “Ron Paul 2012.”
Mozzarella
Before I was reminded of the task, I was admittedly thinking, ”I wish I could talk to someone now. But I don’t want people to interfere into my affairs and my decisions”. Is that even possible?
He meets party donors there, as and when he chooses, appearing to breach the Parliamentary rules which prohibits party political business from being conducted on government premises.
I think it was with this book that Fleming toyed with killing off 007, having tired of the character and the hassles of dreaming up new adventures. It would have been the perfect vehicle. Instead of a third person report on the death of Bond (like he tried, almost, in From Russia, With Love), we have an eye witness report. The tell-tale sign occurs just before the final battle. Fleming practically foreshadows Bond's death when he tells her to "remember who I was". He gives her his 007 recognition number and runs off to fight. She wonders why he would use the past tense, and in the suspenseful fight that follows we hold our breath as Bond and the baddies shoot it out.
6” x 6” x 4 ” Top tier (holds 2 cupcakes or one small cake stand)
Instead, Sangster seems to think the way to entice a younger crowd is to channel the spirit of late-period Carry On films and other softcore comedies (not that there’s any of your actual nudity in this movie). The first fruit of Frankenstein’s researches is a severed arm that gives the V-sign to order, for example, and the Baron himself seems as obsessive a womaniser as he is a scientist – none of which is strictly relevant to the plot.
Because there are those who still speak of loyalty
Four years ago, Alex proposed on a sailboat on the Hudson, so sailing always makes us think back to that day, and we end up taking cheesy kissing photos! It cannot be helped! :)
Type your name and change it to a raster layer.
Georgia manufacturing registered another strong performance in April, with the sector expanding for the fourth consecutive month.
I do not trust people not to hurt me in the long run and that's no way to go through life and no way to view the people in my life. All of you are all teriffic, incredible people who deserve more than that from me and I deserve more than that from me. So this year I resolve to trust the people in my life with my heart.
Haddie came out from dance
Chocolate or Black.
This morning I walked Molls along a deserted beach where the tide was out. Seagulls squawked and fought over grubs in one corner of the sea, the wind whipped my face and the sky was a bluey grey, with storm clouds gathering over Stack Point.
She missed her bus, missed her plane, surely this can be explained,
Dirty on Purpose are heading out on the road with two of their heroes --The Wedding Present and the New Year (ex-Bedhead)!
06 Songbird
The current battle within the Republican Party for the nomination to be President of the the United States is nothing short of a circus. Since, the voters do not demand discussion of the issues from the party and the candidates the voters are left with character assassinations, misrepresentations, and false beliefs. The voters of America have over many decades have put too much emphasis on the position of president. Thus, the voter has forgotten that the laws come from the House and Senate.
Malt: Premium Pale 2-row and Crystal
the Blacks taking buses out
April has also showed me I shouldn’t set goals for myself. If anyone had their money on me not completing any of my goals then you’re the big winner! If you have absolutely no idea what I’m referring to, you can see my dead goals here. And that children, is why following isn’t always for the best. I followed and fell flat on my face. Maybe next month I should set more reasonable goals, like get out of bed in the morning. I feel like I could handle that one.
Communication Department
Although of a more universal nature, the quest for truth continued in my reading. The Mystery of Jesus and Beyond Belief have given me much to think about and contemplate.
Award – Reward – Return Service
The story I'm about to tell did not happen today but a few days ago so it's pretty fresh. Not all my stories are of the "it could only happen to me variety" but this one most certainly is. For whatever reason I know no other person this would happen to!
The neck-warmer is an affordable take – all right, dirt cheap because the yarn was out at clearance prices – on this pattern from the wonderful folk at Purl Soho. Of course I didn’t use the stipulated yarn. It sounds as if it would be to-die-for soft, but it is w-a-y beyond my budget. I used something soft that knitted up to a similar tension/gauge (sorry I can’t tell you any more detail; yarn and needle size were things I originally noted in my craft diary but I haven’t been able to retrieve that since the computer crash).
Seems like a very sympathetic guy, doesn't he? And A Moment To Remember just happens to be one of my all time favorite movies (see clip here). I'll be more than happy to support Yang Jung-mo in whichever way I can, so you can trust that I'll do my best to keep you updated on his progress in the show here.
Re-entering the paddock meant that I’d only 5 km more to go. As always, the nearer I got to the finish line, the more torturous the run became. By now, it was solely a mental challenge. However, I think I’d somehow accustomed to this phase. Instead of exerting more pressure onto the tired body and mind, I tried to remain calm and consistent. The MP3 player had Miike Snow’s Silvia and Cult Logic on heavy rotation now, which was awesome...and timely. At the main entrance and nearby carpark, the resting 5 and 15.5 km runners, as well as traffic marshals, cheered us on. What a fantastic feeling. It was also during this time that the sole of my left feet felt warm, as if some blood vessels had just burst. But I kept going.
The clouds rush dark and wild
You could change me. I want to stop.
“It is, then, clear that the recent signing of the decree is in no way to be read as a hostile act towards the Jewish people, and it is to be hoped that it will not be considered as an obstacle on the path of dialogue between Judaism and the Catholic Church. Rather we trust that the Pope’s forthcoming visit to the Synagogue of Rome will be an opportunity for the cordial reiteration and reinforcement of ties of friendship and respect”.
I spend time at work doing scrapbooking things
Do you use binders to organize things? I'd love to hear how you use them!
in our home of the free,
Lose the "inventor" mentality. We're not doing anything new these days that wasn't being done 10 or 20 or 50 years ago. I don't care if you're using new materials, gluing with new glue, or sewing on your head, you're just stitching FABRIC with THREAD - someone else is bound to think of the exact same technique within a matter of time, with or without your help.
The border punch is one of my "new favourites" - Tonic Studios Stars border and the Snowflakes are 2 layers of a Tonic Studios Multi Detail Snowflake punch. I've got great use from this punch and hope to add a separate post showing all the different ways I use it (if I get time!). I love the way it has 2 parts and can be used in so many different ways to make flowers and not just Christmas ideas.
Him: "Really." (sarcastic tone) I could feel his eyes rolling in his head while he was laying next to me.
a CO alarm should be centrally located outside of each separate sleeping area in the immediate vicinity of the bedrooms. The Alarm should be located at least 6 inches (152mm) from all exterior walls and at least 3 feet (0.9 meters) from supply or return vents.
@ 23:00: 8 EUR Concert + Party
3. Eightball and MJG - Throw Your Hands Up
It is a special occurrence when two happy occasions like family birthday fall on the same day. Expensive, yes, but very, very precious and special.
I am the waterfall
In ‘Ego’ though there is a brief cameo that reminded me of the old Zek in Ivan Denisovich, the one who raised his food to his mouth in the mess hall and maintained his dignity:
But a recent opportunity to write about fertility and challenges that surround becoming a mom got me thinking-Mother's Day can be one of the hardest days for women.
I was mourning the end of summer, but now I'm welcoming fall. Tea, books, flannel things. It's cozy.
I am still quite off colour and as I am having house guests this weekend (scheduling this post in advance) so was really pleased when I went through my stuff to find my image already coloured. I forgot I had it but I coloured it up when I was at Debbie P's house the other week.
Then I was asked about a major development project “known as Atlantic Yards that has been proposed for Central Brooklyn,” containing an arena and a number of high rise apartments.
5 lb. Liquid Dark Extract
This St. Patrick’s Day Drop Three is here to make Erin Go Bragh-less!
The tree guys are coming today to start removing the old tree. It’s exciting and sad at the same time. I’m sorry to see it go but at an estimated 120 years old it had a good life and we won’t have to worry about it damaging our house in a wind storm.
I feel like my heart has stopped beating
As I set off to do the school pickup run, I could see the cloud moving over the paddocks. It was beautiful, but almost a bit surreal. I could actually see it moving like some strange science fiction film.
The parents of three of the four boys who were sent home from Live Oak High School on Cinco de Mayo filed a lawsuit today against the Morgan Hill Unified School District, Principal Nick Boden and Assistant Principal Miguel Rodriguez for violating their First and Fourteenth Amendment rights.
However, there is no uniform practice yet among Eastern Catholics on infant Communion. When my two children were Baptized and Chrismated (Confirmed) in the Ruthenian Byzantine Catholic Church in 1994 (ages 5 and 3), they were the first children in our Eparchy (Diocese) to receive the Eucharist at the time of their Baptism/Chrismation. The Ukrainian Catholic Church decided in 1997 to begin the restoration of infant Communion. Some parishes have implemented the change, but many have not. The tradition of “First Communion” dies hard in some places. The Melkite Greek Catholics (also in union with Rome) have generally restored infant Communion. According to this source, this has happened since about 1969, but many parishes have retained a “First Solemn Communion” that reflects the “First Communion” experience from the Latin Church.
Cousin 'IT' (Jackson) is driving Mom a bit crazy. EVERY day between 4 and 6 pm the Corgi that lives behind us comes out into the yard and Mr Barky spends 2 hours non-stop barking barking and barking - so much he causes himself to wheeze. For some reason he REALLY doesn't the corgi and it not that just barking to say hello barking - this is serious "I'm going to kill you if you come near my fence" type of barking. Mom has been closing the door to stop him but it's like he has a built in alarm clock and dead on 4 o'clock he starts whining to go out.
Realism is a good homonym for the concept I was trying to convey but “Morealism” just didn’t read write or sound good. to me. So I replaced the second ”m” with a ”t” and that was it. Here’s my definition:
SpaceX designs, manufactures and launches the world’s most advanced rockets and spacecraft. With a diverse manifest of launches to deliver commercial and government satellites to orbit, SpaceX is the world’s fastest growing space launch company. In 2010, SpaceX became the first commercial company in history to put a spacecraft into orbit and return it safely to Earth. With the retirement of the space shuttle, the SpaceX Falcon 9 rocket and Dragon spacecraft will soon carry cargo and astronauts to and from the International Space Station for NASA. Founded in 2002 by Elon Musk, SpaceX is a private company owned by management and employees, with minority investments from the Founders Fund, Draper Fisher Jurvetson, and Valor Equity Partners. The company has over 1,700 employees in California, Texas, Washington, D.C., and Florida. For more information, visit spacex.com.
1/4 cup butter, melted 1 teaspoon baking powder
Hi Crafters,
Aren't they cute!? And that's just the beginning folks! The packet includes measuring, money, ten-frame and teen-frame activities, tallies, addition, graphing, number identification, time, AND counting by 2's, 5's, and 10's!! Whew!!!
With a heart that won’t forget.
bag + age = baggage
I'll be back soon to tell you more details about all of it... for now, just a delicious lemon raspberry cake I made for graduation weekend for one of MG's friends that was getting a Ph.D., and a little bit of the ceremony...
I felt a sweet sensation
I grew up in a home where visits were usually restricted to members of our extended family, the Swiss Chalet delivery person, and the Avon lady. We were an exceedingly shy bunch (an admission that would surprise most of those whom we’ve met in our professional lives, as well as many of those whom we’ve known socially). For all of us in my immediate family, socializing, especially with new people, was often very painful. Even as a fully-fledged adult working in a people-centred ‘helping’ profession, the discomfort of ‘meeting the other’ is an introversion side-effect and psychological heirloom with which I continue to struggle on a regular basis.
*Find AFR (American Family Radio), a Christian station with lots of news, on your dial to listen to as you travel. Current events, anyone? You can also listen online.
Then I thought, “Should I make the piece myself?”
An Afghan man who fled from the Taliban to begin a new life in Australia will spend the next 14 years behind bars after a judge rejected his claim that cultural differences had led to him raping a woman.
Sideways, Flashbacks, Flash Forwards, Oceanic Six time, The Island events and off Island...Which of those events/time-lines happen outside of the bloody snow globe that is the "Island"? Are any of them outside of the snow globe? Are Jack and the Castaway's ever out of the confines of the "Island"? If you're a long time reader to my notes you know my answer to that. We have countless examples of events on the "Island" blurring with many of the off "Island" events.
Wait! I think I've told you this before!
I don't know if this was a production conceit or what but Allen seems to have chosen a director who sets up everything so flat and so pat and presents it with such disinterest and plain-ness that this whole matter looks like a made-for-TV movie. James Goldstone's major output, in fact, WAS for television series and TV movies, with only a few other theater movies to his credit - which include this, disaster also-ran Rollercoaster and a movie called Swashbuckler, which was one of the absolute STUPIDEST pirate movies ever made. Trust me on that.
gesso
Sometimes, we meet friends at the park and have a picnic, always fun and a cheap day out too.
Today's catch!
If you read my blog even occasionally, you probably know that I’m going to Peru soon. I’ve been reading until my eyes are bleary. As you can see by the title of this book, I’m trying to learn as much as possible about Machu Picchu. A friend who’s going with me on the trip told me about this wonderful read. The moment I heard the title I thought, “Now this guy is funny.” Happily, I was right about that. He’s very funny indeed. It isn’t often that one finds a travel book as entertaining as this one. Ah, but I’m not writing this post to sell books.
before he ran it over with the 4X4.
I used MME Follow Your Heart Papers and embelishments, with a few buttons and a SEI rub on.
Izzy’s mom smirked as she lifted the grocery sacks into the cart.
The championship wasn’t just Ali’s dream.
FINDING AGNETHA was recently published (November 2011) and is available in paperback English and Swedish, as well as e-book through Kindle and Nook. For your copy, go to www.amazon.com www.barnesandnoble.com for either paperback or e-book versions. See a short video interview about this book at http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mdoBEQdRtA4
I've passed through Glasgow a couple of times in the last couple of weeks on my way to my Mum's in Dumbarton. Dumbarton offers no real ale, well no real anything these days really, so I always stop off in Glasgow for couple of pints on the way. Usually it is one of two Wetherspoons between the station I arrive in and the one I leave from, or the Drum and Monkey, though often this Caledonian Brewery obsessed bar is passed by. I am no fan of Caley beers.
So now that you know a bit about how I've been feeling, I figured I'd update you on what I've been doing since last I posted anything here.
Yet we came together
I am not big into the posters that Sue Patrick likes. I don't have the time or room for something like that. We do file folder games and flip books instead. They take up less room! ;) When it comes to any curriculum, modify it or leave things out, to fit your needs!
Broken hearts become brand new
During the 1940's, Jack Cole created 400 to 500 one-page funny episodes that appeared in the pages of various Quality Comics titles. This is a major part of Cole's work in comics and deserves attention as such.
I'll go back to my studying now. I hope you guys are having more fun than I am!
I let it set for a few minutes balled up and then I gently unwrap and lay out.
Our guiding lights have turned dim and dirty
(Grins.) What's the story behind your blog name?
Never being ones to do things easily, we’ve decided to take our offspring on a trip somewhat further afield, all in the name of 'a holiday'.
Why do people insist on standing around in queues like that to board planes? You already have your seat allocation. If you’re by the boarding gate, they won’t leave without you. So it doesn’t really matter when you get on, as long as you do. Bizarre.
3:25: I check out of the library, after paying $20.40 in fines. Argh. I head off to the allergist for my shots.
The sinless One took on the face of a sinner so that we sinners could take on the face of a saint.
is considered athleticism in the catholic cataclysm
Armalite rifle and the holy trinity
Words from my Veda Guru are probably, the wisest and most accurate especially with regard to Indian philosophy. Words from my previous guru were also very sensible and practicable and beneficial.
Couple things real quick. Despite causing a holy war over football with Oregon yesterday, here’s a pic of some of my favorite Oregon readers who sent me this. Shout out, big love to the Nike State!
The genetic child of the German future would be nurtured by the loving parents of the American present.
The super fine bubbles can easily penetrate into pores and eliminate excess oil and impurities. With the help of papaya and pumpkin enzyme, dead skin cells can be melted gently and then form a translucent radiance skin!
~ I made a lot of money in a short period of time.
speak of the Holy Spirit,
I wasn’t expecting a lot from this book, I don’t really know why. However, I was pleasantly surprised by the skill in Paula Vince. She made an interesting romance slash suspense slash amnesia tale. The combo of the sense of doom he feels along with the romance feel makes it a book that makes an impression. Will it make a lasting impression? We’ll see, but it was an enjoyable book.
5. Beat yolks with other half of the sugar until light and creamy.
I go into school to talk with the principal. The whole meeting was less than 5 minutes long. The head in the crotch thing.... what a joke! The kids had been playing some old-fashion freeze tag to celebrate Kansas. To unfreeze someone you had to crawl between their legs. So when recess was over and the kids all got inside Max continued to play the game. Oh my gosh!! Maybe a little back ground to HOW Max's head got into a girls crotch before making a huge deal about it?! Seriously, just crazy.
Immigrant caterpillars. coming over here, taking jobs from our English caterpillars. probably getting a flat close by the Olympic Village on BENEFITS, there is probably 600 of them in a one-roomed flat!!!!
I don’t particularly believe in evolution although I think the world is evolving in some ways.
It's time to change that.
Geoffrey Redmond, M.A., M.D.: Dr. Redmond is a biomedical scientist and practicing physician with a long interest in Chinese and Western metaphysics. Much of his work is concerned with understanding the persistence of traditional ways of thought in a world seemingly dominated by science. His most recent book, Science and Asian Spiritual Traditions (Greenwood Press 2008) explores the relationship of metaphysical and scientific thought in pre-modern China. He is the author of five previous books and over one hundred research articles. Doctor Redmond is a graduate of Cornell, the University of Virginia and Columbia University of Physicians and Surgeons. He lives in New York City with his wife, novelist and musician Mingmei Yip.
But they shouted, “Take him away! Take him away! Crucify him!” “Shall I crucify your king?” Pilate asked. “We have no king but Caesar,” the chief priests answered.
39. Been to the opposite side of the country? - No. The farthest west I've been in North America is Chicago, Illinois when I was 3.
He was texting in between our muffled convo, he had an iPhone.
Most of the population growth, if not all of it, is expected to take place in the developing world. The mother of three and her American countrymen will probably not have enough grandchildren to maintain their standard of living during retirement, or anything close to what they’re used to. Her fellow Americans should not be giving any consideration, whatsoever, to the prospect of having fewer children. Let the people in the developing world reduce their birth rates. At the very least the developing world should stabilize its population size.
In a stop at the museum’s gift shop, I ran across some newspaper-themed bow ties. They’re clip-on ties made of pages from The New York Times, covered in a lacquer of some sort.
But y'know what? He can fuck off.
Note: Soluto is completely free, and our friends at the company assure us that this application will be free forever. We at How-To Geek absolutely recommend this software, and the people that made it.
Movember ought to be considered a standard test for modern relationships. The master himself tackles this weighty issue in Jeeves and the Feudal Spirit:
“It seems odd that the wizard hasn’t simply held the castle for ransom until he gets what he wants. I wonder if there’s something else going on here.”
And river flows permeating everything into the substance of mind
Narrator You can do it together? What a nice idea. Perhaps it’s a good job Bill didn’t have other plans today after all, Ben.
3) You start sifting.
Something is wrong when someone does something like that unprovoked. I think it’s telling that he was ready to fight after he did it.
PS: That picture is a bit of a turn off isn’t it?
One story has given me more food for thought than others.
Let’s look on the bright side. Vancouver may not have had any snow to speak of, but Iowa and Idaho, Kentucky and Montana have had their fill. As has (Scotland and) the whole of the Eastern Seaboard from Virginia to Vermont: snow so deep and penetrating that the earth is going to be busy soaking it up, getting ready for new spring growth, filling riverbeds and lakes, dams and reservoirs.
Now to explain how I made this beautiful dress form... I first painted the dress from with gold Dreamcoat paint on both sides. For the stand I painted it brown and then went over it with Rock Candy Distress Crackle Paint. Once everything was dry I decided on the paper and applied it to the side that was going to be the back of the form. I used KaiserCraft's Duchess Collection. I then used some white tulle for the skirt that had dots of gold glitter on it. I then used some old paper that I had that was cream colored and shiny for the top. I added different laces and some pearls to the waist. I put an old hat pin that I found in a junk box into the ribbon flower on the waist as well as a butterfly and Prima bling. On the bodice I used lace and some flowers that I bought in the floral dept at Hobby Lobby. I found a vintage hat on line that I printed out and colored with Smooch Paint in Turquoise. Along the neck and shoulder I used Mudd Puddles Sea Glass for a finishing touch.
And then this morning, lo and behold!, they were gone! Poof!
In a statement on Sunday, Foreign Affairs and Expatriates Ministry Spokesman Dr. Makdessi said that Syria has undertaken steps to show good faith concerning Annan’s plan and informed him of them, adding that Syria has drawn his attention to the escalation in violence by the armed terrorist groups as it announced agreement to Annan’s mission.
I'm talking about the times we leave our children in a room with a bowl full of popcorn, or a glass of cranberry juice on a low table. Or the times we walk away talking on the phone while they are playing at the bathroom sink. When we set up these situations, do we expect that our toddlers know better than to dump popcorn on the carpet, juice on the couch, or water all over the floor?
jimmy: what's wrong with my boots?
Vanguard 4.4%, 15 min. 0.25 oz.
It´s the kind of company that whispers wise words right into my heart, that unleashes my wild inner child and in the end doesn´t do any harm.
FUTURE FEATURES ────────────── If you'd like to help me develop any of these features please contact me on Facebook or Twitter. ● Google +1 (Google Plus One), Reddit points, LinkedIn Share count. ● Integration with Google SERPs. Similar to SeoQuake or the SEOBook Firefox extension. ● The ability to compare site ranking stats, side by side. ● Keyword Ranking Checker to check search rankings. ● On page Keyword Analysis ● Integrate the Keyword Tool with the Google Adwords Keyword Tool to make keyword research faster. ● PPC Integration (Adwords, Adsense, Microsoft Adcenter, Yahoo Search Marketing) ● Support for Wolfram Alpha ● Page speed / Speed test ● Domain name generator ● Content spinner ● An affiliate marketing dashboard ● Better descriptions so any Web Designer / Developer can work with the tool. ● Google Analytics Integration ● Google Chrome SEO Toolbar ● Allow Google Chrome SEO Add Ons so developers can contribute plugins. Current sources of data inlcude :
A painter took Matisse’s “Harmony in Red” painting (on the left) and injected Hello Kitty into it; when I first saw it I didn’t know whether to laugh or cry. I have appreciated works of Matisse for such a long time; and the Kitty plopped into the middle struck me as a symbol of the “All Things Cute & Pink” step-daughters that took over my life. It was my own little private joke, but I’m not sure I want to continue to portray myself as a “Hello-Kitty obsessed grown women re-living childhood and thinking it’s cute”.
Only one thing left to do to wake myself from this apparent dream ... opening the french doors to the porch I gently step out into the brilliant sunlight and ... and.... oh dear my back steps from the porch appear to be missing...
In my next post I will address the matter of the legitimate extent of the exception.
Where: Sheraton Hotel lobby, 1400 Sixth Avenue, Seattle, WA, 98101 (206) 621-9000
key to the state’s future.
As the two of them looked up at her, the kitchen suddenly got quiet. All eyes were on Abby, all conversations suspended.
That night we had turkey dinner and held a fashion show for the guys as to what we got! :)
I think a friend of mine put it best in a facebook message she sent out.
I'm not sure if these plans even still exist, but how fucking cool would it be to have these framed and hanging on your living room wall? And no, I wouldn't try to put them to use. At least, not until my loving wife is killed in some freak lawncare accident.
I remind myself how lucky we all were at this time in history to hear your guiding direction, the leader of ICM displaying her true connection ‘with woman – with midwife’. A voice of experience, advising Australian Midwives to avoid the pitfalls of political power and dominance, to stand strong and united, with one voice as a profession in our own right.
More of a curious set of mood pieces for the multifaceted than a specific collection of songs that tell a story, define a purpose or something to carry the Top 40 for yet another pointless week, Espεяαиτo is very much a product of its time that happens to fit into our own era with a curious, even eerie, sense of relevancy. Knab it!
Here is a list of donations from organizations and countries so far.
The cowboy then handed his drink back to the attendant and said, "Me too, I didn't know we had a choice."
It's April Fool's Day. I think I'll be foolish today.
So, alas, the magazines don't tempt me to buy them with their cover stories. The articles do not appeal to me. I have a never to be bikini ready body and arms better kept secret from the world.
So, when looking at this new list that I am planning to make, I ran across something I haven’t really had to deal with much before; tracking wounds on multi-wound models.
The Durban Organised Crime Unit had found that a man and two women had been taking out funeral and insurance policies for people and then finding homeless people or prostitutes to kill so they could produce a death certificate and make the claims.
Other scams offer business opportunities to people to make some additional income by setting up a business, often by working from home or online. The perceived advantage is flexible working hours. However, the products or services subsequently prove to be worthless. But by the time you have started to try to sell them, you would have already paid an upfront fee to register and spent more on set-up costs.
The film follows a company of soldiers stationed in Iraq, where they already chafe under the hot desert sun and tense relations with the indigenous population. One soldier, Angel Salazar (Izzy Diaz), decides to film life on the base, believing that his work will get him into film school when he goes home. There's a grim irony to this thought process, the home videos a young Steven Spielberg used to make where he and his friends reenacted war now replaced by a taping of a real one. But his journal reveals the first, and deadliest, flaw of the movie: Salazar, and his comrades, could not be more simplistically written or agonizingly two-dimensional. To a T, they make casually racist comments about Iraqis and show no remorse for their lethal screw-ups. A green soldier ends up killing a woman at a checkpoint when her car speeds through, and not only does he not struggle with it, he brags into Salazar's camera.
the Nigerian military now has
“Mad Men: A term coined in the late 1950’s to describe the advertising executives of Madison Avenue. They coined it.” Those are the words shown after the theme song of the pilot episode of AMC’s hit series, Mad Men. After those words fade away, the view shifts to the infamous back of Don Draper’s head. He is sitting at a table at a bar. Within the first two minutes of the episode, he pulls out a Lucky Strike cigarette and begins smoking. Lucky Strike cigarettes: the pinnacle of Sterling Cooper. Don tries to persuade his waiter to leave his trusted brand of cigarettes and switch to Lucky Strike. Persuasion. Then, Don heads to the home of one of the multitudes of women with whom he will have an affair throughout the series. Betrayal. The next morning there is a bird’s eye view of Madison Avenue, buzzing with corporate America, as Don enters his own office. Every single man walks through the revolving door wearing a dress coat, a top hat, and carrying a brief case. Corporate America. In the elevator the viewer is introduced to four characters who will eventually prove to be leading characters of the series. As they enter the office one of them says, about women and in defense of gawking at one in the elevator, that “you gotta let them know what kind of guy you are, then they’ll know what kind of girl to be” (Weiner). Degradation of women. They chuckle and walk into the office of their coworker Pete Campbell, who is about to get married. As he speaks with his future wife on the telephone he says, “of course I love you, I’m giving up my life to be with you,” a simple statement that epitomizes an entire theme of the series, which is the American dream. Within the first ten minutes of the very first episode, Matthew Weiner, the writer of Mad Men, brilliantly touches upon virtually every theme of the show. The viewer immediately knows what to expect, and one cannot help but be intrigued. That’s just what Mad Men does. It shines a light on the imperfections of human nature in a blatantly evident manner.
Based on the Woody Beer Wagon itinerary, I settled on a Saturday afternoon visit during a stop at the Whole Foods Market in Scottsdale. My son-in-law and I arrived early so I plated a serving of curried rice and chicken and enjoyed that with a bottle of Deschutes Inversion IPA. Ahhh. We enjoyed or lunch and stayed out of the way while Mr. Frank set up his traveling beer show. I think the Marine had some wings and an Obsidian Stout – he’s a Deschutes fanatic, too.
We also glory in our sufferings, because we know that suffering produces perseverance; perseverance, character; and character, hope. (Romans 5:3-4 NIV)
Love S
But the second rule bucks that waiting. The second rule is “Be where you are.”
as seven editors with 29,857
A friend of mine was throwing around some ideas for some different costumes. One thing that came up was The Goon.
Today I thought I'd post a few photos of some of the fun stuff that we did when Sal and Mike came out to visit. This actually only covers a few of the highlights, which makes me realize just how much we packed into a few days!
The slumbering giant has awoken
Finally,you have a lovely brown egg with a leaf pattern on it.
Reason To Believe by Dashboard Confessional
Can you think of any others?
Ms Beal booked Mr Livingstone a £4,234 club class seat on a flight to Miami – while his spin doctor travelled economy class on the same flight for a fraction of the price.
Craft is a meaningless concept when it comes to art.
"But smg, hwhy not show off all 72?"
And, truthfully, Gene Vincent never bettered them, though that's no reason to ignore the rest of his career. While the Blue Caps Mark One rapidly disintegrated, later line-ups still cut hard rocking classics; Lotta Lovin', Cat Man, Who Slapped John, the delirious B-I-Bickey-Bi-Bo-Bo-Boo, the slo-mo menace of Baby Blue. Live they were a very tough act; Gene's pose rarely changed, legs apart, gripping the microphone stand as if he might collapse, always looking at some imaginary saviour in the balcony. Footage survives of Tex Ritter's Town Hall Party TV show, and the Blue Caps - with Johnny Meeks now on lead guitar - look magnificent in pink peg slacks, perfectly bequiffed; the pace at which they play was probably down to the diet pills Gene lived on. They also appeared in a film called Hot Rod Gang (1958) about a drag racer who joins a rock 'n' roll band (with assistance from Gene in a brief, not too embarrassing, acting role) to make enough money to race. But in spite of Hot Rod Gang and incessant touring, record sales were constantly declining and by the end of the decade Gene Vincent's career seemed washed up.
Put the flour, sugar, baking powder, salt, and butter in mixing bowl. Beat on slow speed until everything is combined and you have a crumb mixture with a sandy consistency. Gradually pour in half of the milk; beat until the milk is just incorporated.
"A group of us at the Law School have decided to convene an event, Web 2.0, Social Networks and Innovation: Trends, Challenges and Opportunities, 30 November 2007, 6-8pm.
I used 2 buckets for a 400sq. ft. living room.)
I DANCE: with The Man to country music, and with my friends to whatever makes us smile, and with my daughters to Joe McDermott.
Note: An ongoing news story in South Africa involves the scandalous allegation that residents a housing development in Makhaza, Khayelitsha. in the Western Cape, which is under the control of the opposition Democratic Alliance were forced to use open toilets, however, as in so many things where politics are involved the situation may not be quite as it appears
Housing on this scale has horrendous cost implications. Who will pay for these immigrants to be housed? Desperate chancellors will resort to desperate taxation measures. One option would be to impose extra taxes on the sale of houses and use the money to pay for these new houses. Compulsory purchase of private land at prices well below what land could command on the open market would become the norm. Single dwellers now own a large part of Britain’s housing stock. In instances where they lived in a dwelling whose total floor space was greater than the government norm (yes there would eventually be such a thing), they, too, could be the target of compulsory purchase orders and be made to live in smaller dwellings situated in diversity-rich areas. Their former houses would then be used to accommodate immigrants with very large families, especially those inclined to polygamy. Or these owners could be compelled to take in lodgers (the rent would be set by government). In short, there would be no limit to what a rapacious and cruel government – Conservative or Labour - could inflict and will try to inflict on whites in the name of diversity. Look at what has already happened.
Someday we'll transcend from bondage to decay to freedom.
TUES. 9/30 - DAFNI @ THE PIKE BAR IN LONG BEACH, 8:30pm. 1836 E. 4th St., one block west of Cherry. 562-437-4453. Full bar and dinner 'til late. Americana Jazz. http://www.myspace.com/thepike
The mozzarella goes on a pizza every Friday night, but we've been slower at eating our way through the hard cheeses. Well, me more than Dan, because the first 9 really weren't that great. We're chalking that up to the learning process, bug finally, cheese number 10 seems better than the rest, a little sharp (aged 7 & 1/2 months), and perhaps needing a tad more salt, but a good texture and flavor. After cutting it open and sampling, I sliced some onto a piece of bread, popped it unto the toaster oven until melted, and topped with Farmgirl Susan's Green Tomato Salsa. Yum! I couldn't eat enough! Maybe it was the salsa, hopefully it was the cheese. It melted beautifully and tasted great.
Zinkhan, who has a doctorate from the University of Michigan, is a professor at UGA's Terry College of Business and had no disciplinary problems, university spokesman Pete Konenkamp said. Before joining the school in the 1990s, he held academic positions at the universities of Houston and Pittsburgh.
He sat down beside Ann and they kissed. He could smell and taste wine on her mouth and she handed him the big bottle of Valpolicella the others had been passing around. He took a swig of the wine, relishing the full fruity taste and the tingle of alcohol.
Okay, pay-off time. You probably know -- and if you don't, you do now -- that I don't smoke. So cigarette tax increases are not a personal issue. But folks: replace "cigarette" with "beer" or "booze" and "smoke" with "drink," and you've got the same issue, same problem. Beer tax increases usually don't raise revenue. Revenue stays the same, or drops, and less beer is sold, which means less money is made by brewers, importers, wholesalers, and retailers, which means less revenue from that part of the chain, and jobs are usually lost, which means less tax revenue and more benefit payments. It's a brilliant cycle.
4. Head Up High (6:37)
Claire is a British singer. She was the lead singer of Steps since 1997 till 2001. After the reunion of the band in 2011, she remains the lead singer. She had begun her singing career with the band Cossie & Bonnie. The trio was successful only for a short time, and disbanded after the release of their second hit single.
.no bedwetting in el paso
The door opened.
I am not a dentist. I know more about teeth and injured teeth and abscessed teeth than most folks but I can not fix your cavities, your meth-mouth, or your impacted wisdom teeth. I know you know this but you come to me anyway and I'm tired of it, especially when the conversation goes like this:
As colonization of the Americas expanded, the English, French and Dutch also imported horses such as Morgans, Percherons, Belgians, and Clydesdales. Like the Spanish horses, some of these horses also escaped or became lost, and then they bred with the wild herds of Spanish horses. By the 1800's, the Mustang had evolved into a different animal than a pure Spanish wild horse, except for one important characteristic: hardiness. Other attributes of Mustangs are high endurance, extremely strong herding instinct, very hard hoofs, and superior agility. Herds have adapted to the conditions of their locations and so Mustangs that live in cold climates are shaggy and small, and desert Mustangs can survive on remarkably small amounts of food and water.
Run the cardboard and the pages through your bind it all to make holes so you will be able to bind the book together later on.
Meanwhile, he was pursuing a career in politics. In 1882 he was elected to the Grand Council of Bern, becoming president of the cantonal government for the 1886-1887 term. From 1884 to 1890 he was a member of the Council of States of Switzerland and from 1890 until his death a member of the National Council, the other chamber of the central Swiss legislative body. In politics as in education, Gobat was a liberal, a moderate reformer. A major piece of legislation he sponsored in 1902 applied the principle of arbitration to commercial treaties. By its terms, Switzerland agreed to insert in all commercial treaties such as customs agreements, a clause requiring the parties to submit to the Permanent Court of Arbitration at The Hague any dispute that might arise from the day-to-day operation of the treaty.
let the cookies firm up a bit on the pan before removing to a baking rack to cool.
I can't believe I am blogging another Giants game. You are probably all pretty sick of these posts by now. My apologies. But Sunday was a perfect day for a ball game. It was misty driving to San Francisco but then the clouds vanished and we ended up getting hot and sunburned! Love that unpredictable Bay Area weather.
If you want to colour the top of the box, you need to turn your cardstock over, as this is the surface that will appear on the top of your box. I have chosen to sponge in the same colour as my stamped flowers, darkening what will be the centre of the lid.
✈ Was the "Island" a created environment? (Either physically or virtually)
Please allow extra time for your trip on this day. MTA encourages transit riders to ride the Light Rail and Metro Subway to avoid downtown congestion. The Baltimore Marathon will loop through many areas of Baltimore City, causing MTA to put significant diversions in place to maintain local bus service. This may require customers to catch a bus at a designated bus stop on a street that may not be a part of the normal route. The MTA is expected to post an official website page for exact route diversions and other details.
The 49ers are ready to win, and win now. They have the toughest defense in the league and a whole lot of talent on the offensive end. All they need is for their new wide receiver corps to step up this season. LaMichael’s speed will just add to their ability to spread the field and put up numbers like they did against the Saints this past post season. LaMichael should feel at home because he is joining a dominant team. A similar situation he stepped into at the University of Oregon.
So 2012 is off to a good start. Life is looking up.
N: Did you just have a mohair re-root?
We are really glad to be able to meet with everyone on stage!!
The pie I'm offering today is a combination of OLD and NEW.
Make ahead: Chill until ready to serve, up to 3 hours ahead. Serve at room temperature.
games and all. Looking at the
But every now and then, there’s a tourist attraction that surpasses expectations. It becomes more than just a guided tour, it becomes a memorable experience. That is what happened for me at the Actun Tunichil Muknal cave just outside of San Ignacio, Belize.
So this morning I woke up dreaming that I was in a room full of people, the majority of whom were women. They decided to kick the men out and make it a women’s caucus, then the women began to busily—and chaotically—figure out how they were going to organize themselves and what they were going to do. A male surgeon, who had been hiding behind his scrub suit and cap, stood up to tell us what to do. I ordered him out of the room and he went.
Put the bacon in a large skillet , and place over medium heat.Cook, stirring occasionally, until the bacon is cooked through but still tender. Add the vegetables and cook for several mintutes. Add the kimchi, and cook for a few more minutes.
My school semester ended December 23 (srsly) and up until then, besides studying for exams, I was working almost every day and continuing to move out of my old place and unpack my new place. It was a total disaster.
I am reminded of how embarassed I am
“Then where is the profit? It is just unbelievable. Even a school boy will know that a company would not give away all its profit just to clinch a deal. If this happens, the company will be running at a loss,” he said.
Brake cooling necessity: Medium
One of my biology professors at college was not only a good scientist, but a good artist as well. When he was in graduate school he made a beautiful oil-on-canvass painting of a rainbow trout. The first time he unveiled it was during a presentation in front of his fellow scientists. He explained to them that it had taken him a lot of time and skill to make such a striking, life-like picture of this beautiful animal.
High latitude magnetic fields have been observed with solar telescopes on the ground. However, actual process of the polar field reversal is poorly understood because of the difficulty of the observations on the extreme limb combined with atmospheric seeing effect. The solar optical telescope aboard the Hinode satellite allows us for the first time to perform extremely high-quality observations of the deep polar region of the Sun (Figure A). The initial discoveries include that there are many magnetic patches with intense magnetic field in the polar regions. Their field strength is close to that of sunspots, and their size is as large as small sunspots called pore.
It is unknown if Fulford will update his blog or appear on Mopal this week, given the circumstances.
So instead of hiding, we can step out to meet God at the point of His call. Is He calling you to forgive? Is He calling you to lead? Is He calling you to love? Is He calling you to something you've been hiding from? Then, step out! As Scripture encourages, Do not throw away your confidence in God (Hebrews 10:35). Instead, move forward in faith.
Bristol's campaign against the opening of a Tesco in Stokes Croft has resulted in a legal bill of £2000. To help pay it off while having fun at the same time, there's a fundraising party down at PRSC, on Friday 13th April. So, if you're in the area, drop by!
And he made her his, at the Roseville Fair
But hidden away among the clouds above the Utcubamba Valley in the northern Andes lies the imposing limestone fortress of Kuelap, a pre-Incan walled city that is the largest stone structure in not only all of Peru, but the entire continent.
Unless you’re very hungry, I’d recommend just getting the 200g patty, since it’s quite rich and it does get a bit monotonous after a while. Better to have more variety by ordering the smaller patty and having a couple of the awesome starters as well.
Next Saturday, I will get up bright and early and have breakfast with my oldest daughter. We will plan out what we will be looking for and where we’ll go. Will I find Conan the Barbarian comics for a friend’s birthday? I will be looking for Buffy the Vampire Slayer and Angel comics. I’m also looking for the next volume in Stephen King’s graphic novel series The Stand.
I was just going to screw them into the shelf fronts and categorize, however, when I held them up, even the narrow ones were a smidge too big and just wouldn't look right. Enter sad face.
12. Broken Dreams (prod Theretracks)
This was my first time making pizza dough. I think it turned out pretty good. I could really use some practice stretching it out for a pizza. Let's just say my pizzas were more rectangular than round. The recipe I used yields 4 dough balls. We used two for dinner. I checked in with a friend to see if I can freeze the other balls. She said I could and told me sometimes she makes calzones with the dough and the freezes the calazone. What a great idea! I'll have to try it.
The homeless guy that lived by the creek.
Financial markets appeared to be watching cautiously, but initial trading made it clear that they were unshaken as yet.
4. Let’s Get It – vocals, lyrics & music by Stevie Robinson
113.5 x 55 x 12.4 mm
(4) Terms that were intelligible to Jews, such as Son of man, were not the most suitable when speaking to Gentiles who had not read the book of Daniel.
Here is the root of the root . . . and the bud of the bud . . . and the sky of the sky of a tree called life . . . which grows higher than the soul can hope . . . or mind can hide. It is the wonder that's keeping the stars apart.
Walking up the category works, too. For a bit more cash (lads, lasses: take cash tomorrow, don't feck about with credit cards, you'll just hold up other folks who need to get a drink! And don't forget plenty of dollar bills for tips!), you can get Jameson 12 Year Old, Bushmills 10 or the 1608, or Tullamore 10. See what Irish can offer.
“Now if anyone has caused pain, he has caused it not to me, but in some measure—not to put it too severely—to all of you. For such a one, this punishment by the majority is enough, so you should rather turn to forgive and comfort him, or he may be overwhelmed by excessive sorrow. So I beg you to reaffirm your love for him.” – 2 Corinthians 2:5-8
LaLa and Papa couldn't be more thrilled. Our twin daughter is having twins (I can't wait for them to get to experience all that goes with two)!
Easter Cone Baskets (filled with Jelly Beans)
Select entries will follow me around the United States and Canada and become part of my artist panels, book signings, and exhibitions. Please note: no entry will be returned to you.
14. When asked if Paul repudiates the ugly comments from the newsletter, Paul not only repudiated them but said his entire life repudiates those comments, because his words and actions are 180 degrees apart from racism. Video:
"Come on Greenie, get on up here man, bring little Moon to...uh-hu!"
63ml passionfruit puree
The King in the Golden Mask contains:
let me always be with you
02/24/2012 SELL 0.01 eurcad 1.34338 02/27/2012 1.33837 +5.04
Assalamu Alaikum!
match the theme) with vintage and unique touches, Laura also wanted to
Since January I've been teaching a KIDDs class on Wednesday nights. For a month and a half I've been going with a group to conduct a Sunday afternoon service in a nursing home. These two things have blessed my heart to no end - - - but that is the story of another post.
1 collective
and we came home to snuggle up on the couch and watch 'cloudy with a chance of meatballs' under a quilt instead of nap time. What a perfect sunday afternoon. We'll definitely be back up there again and my only advice is book in advance because it books out quickly for sunday lunch!
In case you have not noticed, there is a huge trend in logo design currently. It is called a web 2.0 logo. So now you are probably asking yourself… what is a web 2.0 logo? Web 2.0 logos look similar to icons like the Facebook logo, twitter logo, etc. Many companies desire these types of logos because they are the flavor of the week. To be more specific, these types of logos are pleasing to the eye in many mediums because they have the illusion of being 3d. They utilize gradients which are where the image fades from one color to another. (Example below)
Today is my day for the Table Topper Blog Hop...
newer desk for den
Luke is being all kinds of mean on twitter. I think that Amy may destroy him at some point. Sometimes, I worry about Luke. And then sometimes I just don’t care.
It can be almost guaranteed that any statement or belief which can be deemed to be politically correct is, by the same token, factually incorrect.
11-Manimal
Add remaining ingredients and puree on high for 5-10 seconds. Chill for several hours or overnight before serving. Makes about 2 cups.
Please go to the following link and send message to President Putin asking him to intervene in this case to secure the release of the women and to pardon them if they are convicted.
Waiting in the wings? Kevin and I will shortly be writing a new article for Star Trek Magazine, as well as finalizing the outline for what will be the sixth Vanguard novel.
In discussion among the comments it is revealed that the problem with Izhmash tanking (they're bankrupt) and of Kalashnikov's in various types and calibers generally, is because of the Soviet-style command economics there is an oversupply of AKs in Russia. Since they are basically Teh Bomb and indestructible, Izmash is literally underwater - they haz lost the market because of flooding ze pool…
Ask me a question on the air from 10-midnight EDT Thursday, April 26 when I am the guest on the Be The Light Now BlogTalk Radio show. (That’s the West Coast friendly time of 7-10 PDT.) The call-in number is (347) 539-5349.
By means of the above, and many other examples I could point to, conditions have been inflicted upon us which can not fail to bring about our destruction in whole or in part, and, in fact are already doing so.
Response Papers: Response papers should articulate your thoughts on a specific theory presented in one of the assigned readings, which also must be quoted and cited. As part of your own response, it is important to unpack the hows and whys of a given theorist’s position. In other words, show the reader that you have command of the internal argument at hand. The focal point should be on the theory in question more so than on any film or television show(s) screened, though you are welcome to draw on examples from the latter as needed. All responses should be about two full pages (typed & double spaced), well-written, proofread, and have a clear point that avoids summary.
Olshan AF, Teschke K, Baird PA. Birth defects among offspring of firemen. Am J Epidemiol 1990; 131: 312-321.
If our heart chakra is out of balance and we are communicating more from the head, many misunderstandings occur. Closing the heart and communicating from the head often follows a trauma when the heart has “been broken”. We feel the need to protect ourselves from further pain and so we close down the heart chakra. Isolation and loneliness often result. Individuals with an imbalanced heart chakra seem emotionally unavailable and distant in their relationships. Intimacy is very difficult for them. Drug and alcohol addiction are often a result of an imbalanced heart chakra. Pg 111
Others claim to fight for freedom, they say they are fighting for their entire nation, but in reality they are not fighting for a nation they are fighting for greed, they are starting wars to satisfy their own needs, power is corrupt it has caused this world to erupt, we’ve exploded into a never-ending cycle where we hurt one and other hoping to obtain more power
Writers : Kona Venkat
Sandra also provided a beautiful handmade pot and showed us how to artfully arrange the flowers we had made. Take a look at my completed arrangement, I saw similar designs selling for $295 at the show!
ETA: Oops, I forgot to mention that this giveaway is open to continental US residents only. Simply because the chocolate would melt before it reached you. Sorry!
Kitch Garden, and Kim Klassen.
Just cut some strips of paper, you decide on your size. Curl them by rubbing them against the side of your table. Using stick pins, attach the paper to a styrofoam cone. Those cones come in all sizes so you could make a fun display out of these.
To give a brief overview: since 1993, hundreds of women have been found in the desert, deserted lots, and landfills, as well as in more public areas. Mexican government officials and various NGOs estimate that around 350-600 murders have occurred, though there’s no way to get an exact figure, especially since thousands of women have disappeared without a trace over the years. The youngest of the (known) victims are five years old and the oldest are in their seventies, but most of the victims are teenagers and young women in their early twenties, many of whom worked in maquiladoras along the border. Before dying, many of the women suffered through various forms of unimaginable cruelty–stabbings, burnings, beatings, rape, genital mutilation, breast mutilation. Because of the nature of the murders, the femicide has often been sensationalized by the media. But as one of the book’s contributors, a forensic psychologist named Candice Skrapec, writes:
I am so excited! I'll also be getting another item in the mail to do a test and giveaway with... more on that later but I think you'll love it!
I had several painted pairs prior to these (several I sold right off my own feet) but these became my go-to pair for everything. Dressing up? Birdy boots. Dressing down? Birdy boots. Junkin in the fields through the rain and mud? Birdy boots. Lifting my foot up onto a stool during a photoshoot? Birdy boots.
Then, in "biggest" or "largest", there's no clear answer, because there's a "largest caliber", there's a "heaviest projectile", there's a "longest projectile", there's a "biggest cartridge case", and other factors.
How right was Monsieur Bastiat! Bastiat applied his analysis to a wide range of issues, including trade barriers, taxes, and government spending.
In all seriousness (as serious as one can be about cookies), if the thoughts of hosting a get together where everyone bakes a different cookie to share with one other so that everyone goes home with an assortment of cookies and you get new recipes sounds like your kind of fun then here are some guideline and tips for it to be successful (My list is short because to me the main thing is to just have fun and enjoy and it will be fun!):
He was wonderful though. And the way he effectively managed sometimes to made me feel was even better.
On 2009, a group of independent Indian experts, the Strategic Foresight Group (SFG), was mandated by Switzerland and Sweden to flank a process of reflection on this issue. A series of consultations and meetings took place in 2010, i.e., in Montreux (Switzerland), in Amman (Jordan), and in Sanliurfa (Turkey). The SFG then drew up the “Blue Peace” report based on these consultations, which in end effect brought together a good hundred of experts and leaders from the Middle East.
Man… There were a lot of beheadings in this movie.
Or lying on my belly as my bottom reddened beneath his belt.
Whenever I demanded that God rush me a spouse, however, He seemed to whisper this question in my heart, “Rob, is the love of Jesus Christ enough for you? Have you allowed My complete forgiveness and unconditional acceptance to satisfy your heart?”
The story of the Commissioners Plan of 1811 and the effects of the Manhattan grid plan are wondrously illustrated with an extraordinary collection of maps and photographs, documenting the island's almost century-long conversion into a major metropolis. The most substantial, non-printed object is a small marble surveying post.
A new year came upon us, so is the 3rd year of the government of Sheikh Hasina- HM Ershad- Hasanul Inu – Maolana Misbah-Ul-Islam- Comrade Moinuddin Khan Badal. Under siege by police and neo-gestapo RAB; the new years eve was fairly uneventful. At least there was no public display of sexual harassment in the form of a torn clothe student at Dhaka University Student center premises.
The movements of the 1960s did great things, but the majority of the changes produced affected primarily Americans, rather than the rest of the world. I’m aware that Kennedy started the Peace Corps in the 1960s and that many of the revolutionary events involved the Vietnam war in some way, but there can be no comparing the global understanding of that age and ours.
Mirrored Mind (Kyoshin), Sogo Ishii, Japan. Drama/occult, 41 min.
Every once in a while. a government official blurts out the truth about departmental activities in a way that gets picked up by the media, and it goes viral. Ans so it was when EPA Regional Administrator Al Armendariz confirmed the widespread suspicion that the EPA is at war with the oil and gas industries.
Hubby had to figure out all that needed done, as I was so smitten with that water view that nothing could detract me.
Preheat oven to 375.
I was sideswiped today by how many cultures that I have been privileged to be around and really among. I have realized that far too many times as a leader that I have wanted to “multiply myself”. I mean that like this… because I dress a certain way, listen to certain music or even go to a certain church that the people I influence are not always called to my tribe. I have seen a lot of leaders and myself included get so frustrated and caught into mental spider webs because my fruit was not what i hoped it would look like it. Oh, how wrong I have been and I apologize to those that I have hurt on my journey. My education this past semester has stretched my faith and cultural peripheral.
“The Department of Social Protection makes every effort to respond to customer feedback,” came the response. “And it was in this spirit that the advisory notice was displayed.”
above it all
Hitchcock’s final film and one of his most horrifying. The Necktie Killer is stalking London, strangling unsuspecting woman with, you guessed it, a necktie. This film features one of the most disturbing scenes of rape and murder ever put on film, at least up until 1972, when this movie was released.
Why? Because in today's economy, being able to buy a refrigerator and have it be nothing more than a slight inconvenience is something to be grateful for, and having stores with decent appliance-return policies is also something to appreciate. I know of families for whom a major appliance failure right now would be a financial catastrophe, and though we're far from wealthy it's a positive thing that we can purchase something of this price level and pay it off without incurring interest in a few months. I've also known what it's like to live in a rural area and have much more of a run-around (geographically and otherwise) to do some of the simplest things. And I know--who doesn't?--how frustrating it can be when you don't have good options or have experienced poor customer service, etc.
“I’m afraid it’s not very good news, Lisa.” Dr. Seymour was nothing like my father; he was warm, genuine and treated me like a lady, with respect and courtesy. The concern in his voice alarmed me.
You just graduated college so you are thousands of dollars in debt and living in an urban apartment that costs more than a half of your monthly salary. Just weeks ago you were jet skiing at a friend’s weekend cabin without a care in the world. The sun was shining down upon you, your hair was blowing wild in the wind and all you could think about was the promise of your bright future. You just landed your dream job at an advertising agency making a less than satisfactory salary, but hey you’re really MAKING it, right? That’s how it seems until you wake up one day, unable to move your shoulder. When you try to squeeze your hand or fingers together, you cry. You’re such a strong women, but you cry when squeezing your fingers together? What’s wrong with you? Why are you acting so weak?
Equality, Social Justice, Radical Politics.
Can you see the trees all bare?
“We couldn’t believe it,” said Marko, who is seeking class-action status in the suit.
And the ends may have changed
I have narrowed it down to two pair of brown Skechers.
About the Author: Cressida Elias BA Hons, is a children’s author and cookery author.
1. OK, that’s done and, and on a completely unrelated note, wasn’t Sophie Winkleman lovely in lingerie Monday night?
Mine (another favorite)
Jo @ Squeaky Clean!
Kitchen Supplies:
So what’s with all these women who are drowning themselves in noxious fumes and then venturing forth into society silently assaulting the innocent and unsuspecting?
As I am writing this entry, she is eating a banana. It makes me so happy that she likes it :-)
I grew up where my mum used to cook stews and braising meat. So I can't run away from having these sumptuous and delicious dishes.
Destiny
Nope! It was my hands and feet...Apparently we hold lots of stress in them. Something tells me if I had a petrol strimmer and industrial hedge trimmers, I'd have less stress.
I had been working for my previous company for 4 years and it was my saving grace. The two men I had worked for gave me the big break I needed to finish school & get my bachelor’s in Math. They let me go to school in the morning and let me come there to work in the afternoon. They didn’t care that I only came in for 2-3 hours, all they cared about it is that I finished school. The job was 5 minutes from my parent’s house, and I was lucky enough to be able to save enough money over the 4 years to put a down payment on my lil condo. It was great, but I knew one day I would leave the comfort of
And the face in the shadow becomes clear...
Staying strong and positive...how do I do that?
The morning was completely different from the day before with blue sky and still water providing beautiful reflections. Those in turn prompted me to reflect back on my trip and whether I’d achieved my goal of taking thousands of photos which could be used in my productions.
So we fully expect the launch specifications to be far more impressive.
every year when the frenzy of our winter schedule
3. If it were up to me alone, I would adopt every homeless child and homeless animal that I see or know of. Although Hubs is of the same compassionate mind, his compassion is also combined with wise pragmatism. That’s a good thing. If we had adopted every living thing I have wanted, I would not be a blogger, but blogged about. A lot. (I am not exactly sure how I would raise all those children and animals while a resident in a psychiatric institution, anyway.)
CCD‘s Sequin Mesh Gown in Sapphire is simply too hot to be legal, but it is ! Long, flowing and super sexy, this gown hugs your curves in all the right spots.
Troy: I recommend the site XXXChurch.com. Parents get naïve and think, This will not happen to my kid. But we have to approach porn by going on the defensive and saying, Hey, this very well could happen to my kid. You’ve got to be real. Every guy is going to struggle with porn. We have to be vocal about it. The effectiveness of porn comes from the secrecy. When we keep it a secret, it continues to be a cancer.
- cover with oiled saran wrap and let rise in a warm place for 40 minutes.
How words like "hate" and "cure" don't help anyone.
Anyway, Paul went to live with Svend for about six months while I got on my feet again. In the meantime we contacted social services again and told them exactly what had happened and that I had to have help because I was scared of what I might do if I got into that kind of situation again. More than anything, I was scared I might seriously hurt Paul. This time they actually listened and we were given respite care for Paul once a month. It was just a weekend, but it made a huge difference. We arranged it so that Lise could spend a weekend a month with each of us alone, which she needed, and I’d get a weekend without the children so that I could relax (and yes, I did still go out with my drinking buddies, but I had control over how much I drank by then, I didn't keep any alcohol at home, and I wasn't drunk the entire weekend, the way I had been before). It was also around that time that I discovered I was pregnant with Paul's second sister so having respite couldn't have come at a better time and the partying came to a complete halt.
Homes which in one way or another are related to the country lifestyle.
Liberal Democracy has been transformed into a police state like Stalin’s Russia or Mao’s China to manage immigration or the importation of cheap labour for the elites. The persecution has been going on for over 50 years and did not begin with Political Correctness but is part of the multi-racialists outlook. It got much worse from the 1960s when the new elites have formed an “Ideological Caste” - membership depends not on blood, birth, or class, but holding the right opinions, and to rise in life one has to conform to their ideology.
When I arrived to pick up my daughter, the photo was still being talked about by the girls and a couple of parents so I asked to see it. I must say it was one of those times as a parent where you kind of freeze with indecision. It was not cut and dry. The photo looked "kind of innocent," but only because the faces looked young -- too young to do anything in that bed...right? Clearly, the girls felt something was questionable in their friend's photo. It was just shy of very inappropriate in my opinion because I was assuming all hands were above deck -- or the blanket in this case.
92. Painted Veil
I was twenty-three and in the middle of Army Combat Engineer Basic Training in Fort Leonard Wood, Missouri. Talk about waking up to a bad dream. Then I remembered reading an article about Marilu Henner and her special ability to remember every day of her life with striking clarity.
Latest Government figures show the costs of running the system - the largest in the world - have risen dramatically, to £4.3million from £2.1million in just a year.
GD: I think I am a man with ‘7 changes’ because each time when you see me, you will find something different.
When the banging had stopped, and her screams had changed to soft mewings he got up and started digging. The sound of the shovel had elated relief wash over her. He climbed down, knelt on the lid and said “knock, knock” in a teasing voice as he rapped his knuckles against the lid toying with her. She mistook his mocking tone imagining he had come to rescue her and began banging excitedly croaking the words “I’m here, I’m here” over and over.
At the time of providing the piston inside the tube will certainly awaken from the bottom in place. This piston motion makes up the fat shock absorber which has been formerly became depressed. Oil shock absorber will be looking for a way out so as certainly not depressed by the benefit continues. So this oil will certainly push the particular valve throughout oriface station to open and essential oil will come out or maybe collapse through the routes oriface. At this time the valve in a large starting in the piston will be closed because the spot of this control device over the piston. This surprise absorber oil will hit this valve opening, the aide all the way down and mengaakibat valve is actually closed. But where the inlet valve opens oriface because it is beneath the aide, so that when the fat shock hit along this kind of valve clears. At present essential oil shock absorber can only decrease through a small pinhole line. Since the direct is small, then an oil shock absorber can’t quickly comes down aka impeded. At this moment of impact absorber damping power to the revocation spring oscillation.
15) *Tong Kwai, 2 pcs (optional, for extra flavour)
Theresa and I can catch up and work on a weekly basis. Change of pace from the home office motivates.
Why should I gain from His reward?
Saturday October 8th in the Columbus, Ohio Temple.
Odd Man Out
Why do people seek feedback that is consistent with negative self-views? According to the theory this consistency engenders a sense of prediction and control in the world. The individual can anticipate how others are going to treat them, if others will like them, how others will behave. Knowing what to expect, even if it’s something negative, allows the individual to prepare accordingly, and thus to feel in control in social situations. It also allows the individual to feel like they know themselves well, and that is reassuring.
The glasses aren't hiding the feelings within but there's nobody to see as she descends the stairs. She can't remember where she parked her car and lays out a few expletives before the battered bomb comes into view, "Wish I had a decent car" she thinks to herself, the moment providing a little humour to an otherwise dire situation.
The company went on to develop one of the first commercially successful lines of PCs. Its market value today is $350billion (£227billion). In August it briefly topped Exxon as the world's most valuable company.
Rating: 6.5
Brendan Fehr ... Adam Hughes
Unfortunately when I got out into the real word, cussing like a sailor was not that impressive with folks. They were like, WTF? I have never heard such a musical accompaniment of gasps, sighs, and utter disbelief at the repertoire of cuss words flying freely from my mouth, sometimes neglecting any attempt at being tactful. Shame on me! Problem was I was a young single (no wonder, huh?) mother and unlike my predecessors before me, family traditions would have to be broken when out of the mouth of babes, I heard my 4 year old son spew out some pretty foul cuss words, I have to sincerely look at the source, Yours Truly!
*Barbara Bauer Literary Agency
That being said, over the last couple of weeks we've begun to work on the canter. Impulsively. A little voice in my head (self doubt) suggested it could be problematical. I've spent plenty of time cantering on other horses, even bareback on the beach. Casually, not correctly. I've only worked on the depart seriously on one of my former trainer's school horses. All I had to do was think canter and he knew what was up. I had to ask correctly mind you, but I only had to be responsible for my own flailing limbs.
Once i receive all the below information's from you via email attachment,l will send you a detail email on the next stage of this transaction.
JTHTC Blog (jthtcblog.wordpress.com) is a participant in the Amazon Services LLC and Amazon EU Associates Programmes designed to provide a means for sites to earn advertising fees by advertising and linking to amazon.com, amazon.ca, amazon.co.uk, amazon.de, amazon.fr, amazon.it and amazon.es. Certain content that appears on this website comes from Amazon Services LLC and/or Amazon EU. This content is provided “as is” and is subject to change or removal at any time.
Here are the words and actions if you would like to continue to do this at home:
Smoked Austrian
BUT... even though making the cut was awful, it wasn't long before I felt so much more positive about the book again, and relieved that I'd finally faced facts, gritted my teeth and removed this second character. I know it was the right thing to do. I've now mapped out the rest of the book for my one remaining character and it works a million times better. And even though cutting out that second character was painful, I have put her aside, perhaps for book 6. It's a good story, just not one that works with my original story.
It is claimed Trajan, his adoptive father, had not wanted Hadrian to succeed him, but was thwarted by his wife, Plotina, who covered up her husband's death until she could make sure of Hadrian's acceptance by the senate. After Hadrian became emperor, suspicious circumstance surrounded the assassination of leading military figures from Trajan's reign. Hadrian denied involvement.
The drink looked gorgeous, almost like coffee ice cream with a big layer of foam. The aroma smelled of anise mingling with the rich herbal notes of the vermouth. Each sip started with the flavors of the absinthe and vermouth, again herbal and rich. The flavor of the rye created the perfect foundation and rounded out the flavors. The orange hints and dryness of the bitters came through at the end before the vermouth and the absinthe mellowed into the aftertaste. The texture was the real star--a creamy, velvety Manhattan with a touch of anise. Unfortunately, it was too good to last. About halfway through, I noticed particles sinking to the bottom of the glass. As it turned out, with all of that booze, the egg white just wouldn't stay together. Back to the drawing board.
Hardcover University of Arizona Press (April 1, 2011) Language: English
What's better than tasting the sweets without getting loaded down with sugars!?
On the basis of this understanding, I felt that Prakash was well within his right to determine who is the mayor of Sando. The PP can’t determine it because it isn’t a party….but the COP and UNC are…and the COP was told Sando was under it’s remit. So, then, you ask yourself, what’s the problem? Well no one wants to say…least of all Winston Dookeran who living up to the nickname Duck and Run these days because he won’t answer any question you pose to him about the government or his party, the COP, straight……maybe that is the price you pay if you have your eyes on higher office. What is clear though is that Coudray’s claims that the COP didn’t elect/appoint/nominate her might have some truth to it, since a recent interview with businesswoman Daphne Bartlett indicates that the current leader of the COP may be misleading the country into believing that Coudray had been their pick. There is talk that Marlene wasn’t really the COP pick, that it was instead a prominent doctor from South Trinidad. There is talk that the COP was forced to choose Coudray. There is talk that Coudray is tipped to run in the expected by-election for San Fernando East….earlier this week there was talk that the PM would give in to Ramadhar’s request, give him the mayorship, and give Coudray the position of Vice-President of the Senate…thereby bussing Lyndira Oudit’s throat. There has been much talk….so much talk that the heads of the coalition government talked for 5 hours on Friday evening and the COP executive, MPs etc are meeting at 9 am this morning to talk some more….and all of this becauase Marlene Coudray exercised her right to change her political mind!
sorry for disappearing for a while, i've been super busy.. tomorrow (well, actually today, since it's past midnight) is the day of my/our ball/dance/prom whatever you want to call it. i can't wait!
After over half a century of usage as painkiller, the mechanism of acetaminophen remains much debated. The general understanding is that the action of acetaminophen takes place predominantly in the central nervous system rather than at the site of inflammation. There may be several mechanisms involved that are interlinked across multiple pathways. In one of the mechanisms, acetaminophen weakly inhibits the first step of prostaglandin biosynthesis. Prostaglandins are pro-inflammatory compounds that cause fever, inflammation, and pain. More specifically, acetaminophen selectively inhibits one of the two forms of cyclooxygenase (COX) enzymes, COX-2. NSAIDs also work by inhibiting COX enzymes, but the selectivity of acetaminophen is a key factor in having little or no toxic effect in gastrointestinal tract. Nonetheless, acetaminophen interacts with other neurotransmitter systems, and the detailed understanding of the drug is still missing.
A Met official took the stage to say Ms. White had suffered a short fall and was brought to the hospital.*
and saw a man on a raft drift by.
Want you to be a part
These people slip into my armour and become part of my obsessions and I will love them forever, re-watching, re-reading, and re-listening until I fall out of my rocking chair. Does this make me a character? Probably. I won’t be a bag-lady but I’ll never fit into the normal shape of an old woman. As long as I don’t slobber over young men in public I shouldn’t make anybody sick…but I can’t consciously think salacious thoughts about young men because my grandchildren are stretching into manhood and it doesn’t feel good. The men I want to hook my eyes and ears into are all over thirty – so that’s all right then, isn’t it? And don’t get me started on Timothy Olyphant from Justified. God, that man’s a god.
Diesel’s truck was beside me again. Fritz’s truck came out of nowhere and cut in front of me.
13th of December 2011
a maui morning, the salty
Mind: No. Last time you said you would behave yourself and instead you ate a pint of Rocky Road.
The pungent aromatic bark is used in healing. Originally native to China where it grows wild in the mountains, M. officinalis is now grown as an ornamental for use in landscaping around the world.
Now, decades later, I watch my 7 year old step-son navigate the same terrain as I. His mom’s family has money, which means they can afford the “right” clothes and toys, which may help, but does not vaccinate against the horrors of childhood. I find him to be a sociable, friendly, easy to get a long with, and fun-loving young man. But I also see an eager-to-please, uncertain, sensitive, and fearful little boy. And I have no idea how to protect him or how much to protect him. If I could, I’d shadow him and smack down any little arsehole that gave him a hard time. I’d teach him to fight. I’d give him superpowers. But I need to ask who am I really doing this for? The little boy asleep in his bed? Or am I trying to undo the past of the kid still stuck inside of me?
So why am I so lonely now? I can only blame myself. I look healthy when I am at rest, and that has to make it harder for others to “get it”. Or so my insecurities tell me. My level of asthma most people never see, much less experience. It’s a rare thing to find an asthmatic who needs a power wheelchair and oxygen. Well, the chair is partially because of the severity of issues in my back, but they’re invisible, too. And now, after the hospitalization with high doses of corticosteroid therapy intravenously to knock down the extreme inflammation of my airways, steroid myopathy has greatly weakened my muscles so I again have an odd reason to need a wheelchair. I can’t attend anything on a regular basis when I’m in this level of chronic illness, so I don’t see anyone, and I’m too chicken to pick up the phone and call others who are very busy with their own lives.
Our next stop was at Apfel, a cosy vegetarian restaurant that offered many varieties and a friendly price. With our bellies filled with leaves and veggies, we went for a quite long walk at the Avenida Paulista seeing all sorts of things and people while a light rain poured on us. This same rain kept us company until it was time to head to the venue where the concert took place.
Joy to joy?
Yes, you all read that correctly. I am officially back on the writing wagon – that same wagon I have been trying to climb back on for the past two months. However – introducing my new daughter to the world was a much more important job. But now that she is ‘sleeping like a baby’, it means that I can get a little writing work done!
5. Speaking of cold weather – what can make you feel warmer than an amazing hot chocolate? Nothing. Especially if it is a white hot chocolate with cinnamon! Thank you, La Petit Gateau, I will certainly be back for more.
‘Who are you, you German Nazi to comment? Get off our site.’
Another attractive thing about Lake Como is its marvellous alpine views. During a walking break here, you can embark on some excellent mountain routes, discovering unforgettable vistas that many tourists miss out on.
Think about it: it's a false choice. If they resign their lives to inertia, there's no story.
I know it is far more fun to be a pit bull than a lap dog but I think that Peter Kent could be considered either one. First let me speak of Peter Kent as lap dog. If there is any relationship more central, more enduring and more lucrative than that linking the Harperites to oil and gas corporations, I don’t know of it. The petroleum industry is the, if you will excuse the forced imagery, tail that wags the dog. It is their lobby which is heard above all others. It is their lobby which prompted the disastrous changes in Bill C-38 which effectively gives the cabinet all the power it needs to ensure whatever petroleum project is deemed profitable to their own interests.
The character of Agathe is the sort of career woman who is late for appointments and is constantly receiving and sending messages on her mobile phone. I felt certain Jaoui would be late for our interview in a Paris café, and sure enough, she bustled in 20 minutes late, mobile phone in hand; life imitating art. In Let’s Talk About the Rain, Karim and Ronsard’s attempts to interview the ambitious Agathe turn into a series of catastrophes – scenes that are funny to any journalist, but which inspire a certain apprehension about interviewing Jaoui.
With pick # 6 he went with a DE. I want one of the three best offensive tackles, so we will bypass this. I was intrigued by his choice for the Hawks at #14 – Clemson RB C.J. Spiller. This name has been popping up more often and linked to Seattle. The Seahawks haven’t drafted a RB in the first round since Shaun Alexander over a decade ago. Granted, for most of that time, Alexander was a stud, including his 2005 MVP year that led us to the Super Bowl. Injuries derailed him from there and for some reason, we have avoided making the investment in a top flight runner. It sickens me to think that Ray Rice was available when the Hawks chose Lawrence Jackson with their first pick. Ugh!
Ten years ago I went on a weekend-long backpacking trip in the Magoebaskloof, a tropical area of pine plantations and wet, dark rainforests where the clivia grow incredibly high up in the trees. I was 30, smoking and decidedly unfit. That trip still stands out in my memory as one of the most harrowing experiences of my life (even when compared to the time that guy wanted my car and put a gun to my head to request the key.)
die politics as a strategy to
6Why feels my heart its long-forgotten heat?
The minister felt duly chastened and climbed into the pulpit and went ahead with the service - hymns, sermon, everything. At the end of the service, at the door, he said, "Was that all right for you, Jock?".
8 pm Karaoke, Flo Bama, Florence. Free, Contact: 256-764-2225
Climate Depot
Peace, Blessings, and God grant me the serenity.
Go here to register starting tomorrow:
If what I am going through now is the product of what I have done to him, I feel this is already too much of a burden for me to bear. Again, I have only loved. I might have made some irrational decisions along the way, but I feel I do not deserve like this much.
In my last piece on neo-geocentrism I pointed out how neo-geocentrists consistently exaggerate the nature and authority of the various ecclesiastical documents that touch on the topic.
The Zack Brown Band is performing at the Mandalay Bay (I wonder if its the same place where I watched The Lion King and me and Shane proceeded to translate all the songs into really non-correct French?) Why does this dude look like he's Garge from 'round the bay?
What a week! We have been to Point Pelee three times this week. That's a record for us and we walk, walk, walk. It is a beautiful warm day right now but they are calling for a thunderstorm and rain all night and tomorrow. Good. We need it. There is very little water in the sluice at the Point and the migratory birds need those to be filled with water.
However, sometimes I am asked if faith is a work. The argument is that if we have to do something (e.g. “have faith”), is that in some way earning our salvation? This is an interesting question and I believe many have either thought about it or heard it before.
Then come and serve me, from here unto the East.'
As long as they eat and are enjoying themselves you will be the hero.
So given my current predicament and the lack of new and exciting things in my life I thought I would write a post about some of things that I like both in the kitchen and they gym.. so without further ado here you go…..(note: these things are is not in any specific order)
First I want to show you around this place which had the most fabulous pottery and planters. I always like anything with a face on it , so showing them first them I will show what I purchased
Anncoo's recipe:
Pfizer, the world's mightiest drugmaker, has a large pain research team working on a portfolio of drugs, some of which are generating excitement in the field.
But she walked away from the chance we gave her.
But I was in Houston and oh-so-very-alone. Realizing the “mild viral infection” was clearly something of the “I belong in a plastic bubble” variety, I made the questionable decision to drive my feverish, sleep-deprived self to the hospital to (feebly!) demand answers. And stronger drugs. Within a minute of reading my chart and looking down my throat, the doctor questioned my previous physician’s diagnosis, and ordered blood work to prove that I had mono. (Fun Cher Fact: I do not mind needles, but the sight of blood outside its intended keeping place makes the room spin for me.) Given I hadn’t eaten in a couple days, it comes as no surprise that when I stood up to leave and accidentally saw the vials of blood on the table, I fainted. Waking up on the cold tile floor with lab technicians and nurses standing over me? Embarrassing to the point I wanted to crawl under a waiting room chair and die.
I lie. To family, friends, even myself. For instance, the other day my mom asked me if I had taken the dog for a good, long walk. I was lazy and didn’t feel like walking her again, so I replied yes, even though I had only taken her down the driveway. This might not seem like a “big” deal, but any type of lying is a big deal. It doesn’t matter to what degree or to whom; lying is bad. The good thing is, no matter what, God will always forgive us.
Husband: Why would you do that? Are you afraid they might pay our electric bill?
Both weddings are different styles that fit each bride perfectly and I can't wait to see it all come together!
Paradise Lost 3: Purgatory
A cleverly devised plan to rob the exchequer and chat the constitution. Who has to enforce the Constitution? I can not remember it. Is that something to do with the Government? I am not sure any more.
Beatles - I Want To Hold Your Hand - 12 Million (the biggest selling Beatles single)
Anyway, today I thought I'd share with you some pics I took of some roses I brought in
Released : December 17th, 2003
This is so easy. My current favorite evil genius is blue and very cute. Megamind is everything an evil genius should be. He has witting dialogue, an oddball and loyal sidekick, and a perfect hero to fight. He lives to destroy Metro City. He has an endearing habit of mispronouncing words, a habit that will cause him lots of trouble.
But it is not just Islamists that have been the subject of legitimate criticism in our media. Mainstream Islam as it has been interpreted historically and as it is celebrated today in majority-Muslim countries is not compatible with our humanistic ideal of liberal-democracy. Islamic leaders at their best are not keen on democracy; do not treat women as equal under the law; and do not regard membership of a faith as a voluntary decision, but rather as a permanent state dictated from birth. To leave the faith is to be an apostate who can be put to death.
Personally, I like Tapirs. They remind me of a sepia-toned avatar. Did you know, that Daniel C Peterson, also known as Brother Peterson is a Tapir Whisperer, like Jennifer Love-Hewitt in Ghost Whisperer. Fridays are always good.
“What else wouldst thee wear when riding side saddle?”
4. Sprayed some Vanilla Shimmer Smooch Spritz over all the colors.
Steve Busby of the Royals signed the '74 Highlights No-Hitters card. I actually have another one that Busby as well as Dick Bosman have signed. I'll need to somehow get Nolan Ryan's autograph to complete it.
Your children are so well behaved.
I was in the kitchen, everything clear, just starting to make more candy. (Yes it's becoming an obsession.) In scuffs Jim in his perpetual slippers, holy tee shirt, and his nod to the holidays, his candy cane pajama pants. Any other time of year he would be wearing Cubs pajama pants.
On the playlist are tracks (and occasional appearances) from JP in his Perfumed Garden era, fave album tracks, radio session rarities, a demo version of one his all time top tunes and occasional quotes from Peel himself...
43. The Disreputable History of Frankie Landau-Banks E. Lockhart
After I laid them all out I wasn't that thrilled with the sheer regularity of it all, it was too...clinical or sterile or something. I tried rotating a few squares around and in a way I liked it better but in the end I just left the one to break things up a bit. This is what my plan looks like next to the result
For I’m too tired
It's very easy to make and looks absolutely beautiful, I tried it with chocolate glaze and white frosting it's a winner every time. I'm thinking of adding a third color next time I bake it, probably red. So here it is and I hop you enjoy it as much as we did.
In this poetry how long shall this ghost wander
1 pinch cumin seeds
Saturday: Pumpkin Waffles & Baked Apples
And then we turn them over to the school system, where we have no control over who teaches them, what they learn, how they are taught, or how they will apply that knowledge.
BLITZER: All right, let me go to Governor Romney on this one. An important issue, especially here in Florida where a lot of people have lost their jobs as a result of the decline of the space program. Yesterday Speaker Gingrich outlined a — a pretty long plan on what to do about it and he said that by the end of his second term, if he were elected president, there would be a permanent base on the moon. Good idea?
“Things is done”
Tuesday turned out to be a pretty smokin' day. Literally. As in the whole house filled with it, and we all still smell like a toxic campfire. Think of it as our new perfume. We're calling it Burnt Burrito. So sexy. Meowwwww! Want some?
And threw the rest away - oh
I still advise to steer clear of PayPal (and ebaY too for that matter)
For now, I’m thinking about the cake.
There is unknown potential in the seeds of an apple, but, Lord, I desire to be a tree that produces nourishing and plentiful fruit with an infinite number of potential harvests.
Since I've only worn these once, I don't think I can comment on how comfortable they are.
Mickey Newbury: Frisco Depot
Speaking of the Packers, the state is way down on the team’s longtime quarterback Brett Favre, who came out of retirement three years ago to play for the New York Jets and then the rival Minnesota Vikings. Only a third see him favorably, and 54% unfavorably. The state may be divided over politics, but Favre is one thing on which Democrats, Republicans, and independents almost exactly agree.
Over at The Friendly Atheist, Hemant Mehta has posted this “Big Think” video of Neil deGrasse Tyson discussing whether he’s an atheist or agnostic. Some of Hemant’s analysis, taken from his piece, “When did Neil deGrasse Tyson start using the arguments of Christian apologetics?” is below, and I agree with him. Either Tyson doesn’t seem to know the difference between “atheist” and “agnostic” (if, indeed, there is a difference!), or is deliberately avoiding the characterization of “atheist” because of its pejorative connotations in America.
Then fire for all your worth.
To this day no one cohesive story has been pieced together of actual game content employed by the booth. Oscen swears that the company was attempting its first ever rail-shooter, Ballard that it was a side scrolling beat’em up. Other employees have replies ranging from serious (light-gun shooter) to probably sarcastic (“hell”)
If you asked my children to define Christmas they would probably say “When Mommy and Daddy give me lots of presents!” While this response is not uncommon it is troublesome. This is why I searched for a book such as A Baby Born in Bethlehem. Here, Martha Whitmore Hickman explains the Nativity story with a simple, yet compelling narrative. This story is filled with all the love and joy that only this season can bring.2. Seven Spools of Thread; A Kwanzaa Story
The Mobile Meeting Planner app is accessible from Apple and Android devices. To access it, download the EventPilot Conference app for free from the Apple App Store or the Android Marketplace. Open EventPilot and search for “ARVO 2012” when prompted. If you have a Kindle Fire, your version of the app will be available by Thursday, May 3rd; check the Annual Meeting website for updates.
I have no interest in jumping off buildings, or flying through the air in a rubber squirrel suit,
I consider my work the CPR Training for Child Sexual Abuse. This is my subtext or mantra for the Ten Ways To Safeguard Your Child From Sexual Abuse brand. On behalf of every person who has been sexually abused I give thanks for your willingness to stand, sign and use your voice.
Good afternoon everyone! Today so far has been a bit of a blah day. Not much going on....Leila plays soooo well by herself and Jodus is at school. I guess I could be cleaning up the kitchen but I am still having the worst time getting up in the morning and not being totally tired all through the day. It seems to only make me better when I have some coffee. I was really trying to not be dependant on having it every day but if it keeps me up and going........
1 tablespoon ice water or 35% cream
It is said that it was a man who dressed up as an old lady with a head scarf and a dress, with a basket hooked over his arm and if you crossed his path he would kill you and stuff you in his basket.
If you’re still ready for more, you could check out Merry Farmer – not only does she write in a genuine, enjoyable style on a variety of topics, her first book is coming out soon! I’m looking forward to reading it.
When I set up Timeline Books, I thought to myself that i'd probably publish just the one book. But having enjoyed the whole experience so very very much, my taste for publishing more has grown.
12. My Baby Specializes
Martha Stewart... Double Arches punch.
What is the solution for this crazy concoction of emotions? I usually start with a good cleaning out. Everything gets moved, shifted and pushed and then with writing pad and pen at the ready I create an inordinate amount of lists. A mindful spring cleaning. That is my antidote.
“Are you alright?” she asked, avoiding any direct eye contact, gaze steadily making contact with Hayley’s bare feet, which were gnarly and ugly. She envisaged it a punishment, to have to stare at such an unpleasant sight.
Serves: 6-8
I’m pretty sure I’ll still have my prenatal visit at 6 weeks, and Dr. Google says that they should be able to see a heartbeat by then. I’m going to confirm with my OBGYN about that because I really don’t want to go in unless they are sure they will be able to see a heartbeat. My guess is with numbers this high, they will at 6 weeks, but if there is any doubt, I may push it back.
11pm: Try to sleep
A pewter mug with one of my eye masks...
Simultanously, it’s a way for me to brag. Let’s be honest about it.
The bodyguard held them for her for the rest of the evening.
There is no end of wars. Not a single second of peace all over the Earth.
When I’m at the computer, I always keep paper near too, just in case I need to jot a quick note down. I’ve learned about interesting books I would like to read, writing contests, different types of poetry forms, writing tips, and a ton of other things. One day I’ll try to post a list of many of the links I’ve found helpful about writing. Instead of feeling alone, I actually feel like writing has opened a big wide world.
Well Everyone...that is what is in my Christmas Book Basket this year. Have fun enjoying these books and others. Remember that you still can get free shipping on many of these items and before Christmas evestill receive them by Christmas Eve.
Do not excessively yank at curls. I know it seems tempting, and looks like a fun activity but do not do it. Pulling curls will only straighten out their hair, and instead of it being curly it will turn a little straight and limp. Not cool, especially after they spent hours getting it to where it is now. Thank you.
Claims ‘I told Santa what I want’
Breathe, look, smell, appreciate, hear, love, hug, smile. All free. Put the visa away and go have yourself a merry little simply free day.
But if you do like reading and weightlifting at the same time, then the Acer Iconia Tab A200 comes pre-loaded with the LumiRead ebook app, which supports ePub, PDF and TXT formats, and will catalogue your tomes for you.
s.e.
...well, there has to be a tactful way of putting this, maybe if... oh, forget it.
Love them or hate them, you can't argue that Three Floyds doesn't do things exactly how they want. Saturday's 15th Anniversary party wasn't just a party and beer release; it was a triumph of conviction.
1 craftsman
at the lolcats! nothing new there, but i continue to marvel and appreciate that there are new ones every day, collected lovingly in their own website for us to enjoy. god bless t'interwebz!!!
He’s very reliant on text messages, IM’ing and email for the majority of his contact
The second half of the boom was completely different. For most of the second half life is slowly finding a normal, but this isn’t a boring section. The author made sure to include some conflict that made you feel for the characters. When WWI starts, however, you’re on the edge of your seat. So much conflict and do much pain, again forcing me to hold back tears. The author really sends a curve all the reader’s way about 75 pages from the end. I was about ready to just skip to the end to see how it all worked out, but I just couldn’t bring myself to do it, not wanting to miss a single word of this book.
Waking up early - just seconds before George's alarm - and taking my coffee out to the backyard to water the garden. A small snapshot of what we've got in the ground so far: 170 strawberry plants, 3 dozen peppers (plus one more: I couldn't resist the Thai Hot), 2 dozen eggplant, 1 dozen tomatoes, and hundreds upon hundreds of seeds (cucumber, lettuce, tatsoi, spinach, basil, squash - to name a few).
You sing your song
Medium brake energy
We're almost at the end of our Dragon Month now (I already did the joke about it lasting for like three months so I'll just apologise for the lateness at this stage) and it's been an enjoyable way of commemorating having run the blog for a whole 100 posts! We've gotten a really great following for Dungeons & Drawings, a large portion of which is thanks to other people - friends, family, followers in general - linking us elsewhere and telling people about us and stuff. So thanks, to everyone!
This experiment had her pouring borax into a shoe box.
The test said that it was the fast paced actions of SpongeBob that caused the “brains” to stop functioning.
Made a wrong turn, once or twice
Let’s view diversity as positive values. Each of us work together to make a balanced community!
shining like a magic marker
The dumplings were cooked to perfection. I actually had some for morning tea after my run and then went back for lunch later with a friend.
Falling so hard and it makes me believe I wouldn't find some one like him anywhere else..
For whatever reason, the word ‘risk’ keeps going through my mind lately.
Pretty easy to finish it on up from there. I just figured out how many sticks I'd need, based on the length of my veneer (each stick was about 1").
Incidentally, AirAsia had scheduled a press conference yesterday to address the hike in airport taxes by MAHB, but had cancelled it at the last minute, “due to an unforeseen circumstance”.
All physical diseases including cancer, heart disease but particularly skin complaints have been helped with Hypnotherapy. The power of suggestion and mental imagery is a tool all too often overlooked but which can be of immense help to dermatitis and eczema sufferers by not only alleviating irritation and controlling any pain, but also in helping heal the condition.
with my own selection of threads
Flour for pan frying seasoned with salt, cumin, cinnamon and pepper. (About 1 cup, or as needed)
When is it present? When there is a rope. A rope just sitting there? Well, it has to be… stretched? Plug in the word “taut” (which middle schoolers tended not to know, when I did this with them, but which my 10th and 11th graders tend to find obvious) and you’re basically finished.
Come Junk With Us crew - dreamy
But a survey of liquor stores in four states conducted by the Harrisburg Patriot-News reveals that prices aren't always better across the state line. In fact, in some cases, Pennsylvania prices are cheaper.
We have chosen to highlight the following section as it encompasses our philosophy on entrepreneurial education and economic enhancement:
While the Bible provides us with the information necessary to come to faith, our faith is not in the Bible itself, but in the God of which it speaks. Our faith is in the genuine existence of God and the resurrection of Jesus from the dead. If Christ rose from the dead 2000 years ago, the truth of Christianity is established regardless of the inerrancy or errancy of Scripture. If Jesus rose from the dead, then He is who He claimed to be: the Way, the Truth, and the Life.
Soon after that meeting Alison drafted in reinforcements. A colleague with an unparalleled ability to drone on for hours telling us about her own experience of anything connected with the book in question. She was unbearably dull. And she was Dutch, so our cosy moaning sessions were somewhat curtailed. I realised that every time I went to book club I came away with a headache. And I quit.
“When I came here, I see there is yoga and everything, but we don’t go,” Mr. Hassan said. “A lot of people, they are new to it so they think it’s a gym class, or something. But Hindu people started it, and I think it’s Hindu religion, so I don’t go.”
You may love it, you may hate it. I love this film. I literally waited my entire life for a sequel to the original; and it was the original that hooked me into science fiction in the first place. The style, the sounds, the aesthetics of the landscapes; all were designed to lure in young boys, and lured I was. I don’t see the hate for the newer Tron series; the attention to detail, the soundtracking, and the style are all what made the original so successful, and Legacy has these all in droves. Again, worth a check if you haven’t seen it (although I doubt it.) Oh, and Daft Punk. Need I say more?
The non-state Chinese Independent PEN Centre comments, with grave courtesy: "We cannot but ask: to understand Chinese literature, should the British people rely on... recommendations by the Chinese government alone?" The Centre has objected to the British Council's collaboration with the GAPP, saying that if it "wishes to promote an authentic cultural exchange in a free and civilised way, please do not disregard the independent writers whose works are dedicated to shaping Chinese civil society".
TIP: Online textbooks are reasonably priced, but I would recommend buying a few to pilot or test with a small group before considering going all in for an entire class of students. The investment of a teacher’s subscription is well worth the money for planning, lesson outlines, extension materials, etc…
What makes us anticipate the finale is the picture with Barney and Quinn, surrounded by a bunch of cops. What could have Barney possibly done? Secondly, fans are much more curious now to know who’s Barney’s bride, than who’s the mother. Will viewers get to know who Mrs. Barney Stinson is? Probably in the last 1 second frame or may be not.
the remark that it is better to forgotten than to be
1. The Lord of the Rings - J.R.R. Tolkien
A spokesman for West Midlands Police said: “We can confirm a 50-year-old woman was arrested on suspicion of being drunk and disorderly at Molineux football ground on Saturday.
Good question
contract.
We had some amazing food in Paris, ranging from nice restaurant to street food, but it was all delicious. I kept thinking of thinking of that famous Kate Moss quote, "Nothing tastes as good as skinny feels,"and thought, she must have never eaten the food they have here because it was honestly worth the 10lbs I'm sure I gained. Some of the random deliciousness we had included nutella crepes, this really good cheesy toast, amazing gelato, rich hot chocolate, goat cheese quiche, tart tartin (apple cake), a hot dog in a french baguette covered in cheese (sounds kind of gross, but it was really good!), lots and lots of yummy cappucinos, and the best cupcakes I've ever tried. But I'm pretty sure the best thing I had in Paris that I would go so far as to say is the best thing I've eaten ever was what I had for dinner on Thursday night. We were originally trying to go to this restaurant we had read about in the New York Times, so we walked and walked trying to find it and when we got there it was closed due to the fact that it was Ascension Day, which is apparently a big deal in France. At this point we were tired and starving, so we just decided to head back towards our hostel and find food on the way. We accidentally got off at the wrong Metro stop, and were just not happy campers at this point considering it was like 9:30 at night. So we decided to just go to the first restaurant we saw that was open, and luckily it happened to be a place called Relais Gascon. It was a pretty busy place, and it seemed to be filled with locals, which seemed to be a good sign. We finally got a table and I kept seeing everyone around me order these big salads that looked really good. I was skeptical about getting a salad since I was so hungry, but I decided to order their Salad du Bearnais which consisted of greens, tomatoes, hot goat's cheese, bacon lardons, and a garlic herb dressing, topped with these amazing fried potatoes which were soft like a french fry, but shaped like a potato chip. I don't know what it was about this salad (which clearly wasn't very healthy), but the combination of all these ingredients together was the most delicious thing I've ever eaten, hands down. I'm definitely going to try to make one when I get home because it was amazing!!!
Consider two putative properties: the property of “cowness” (or “being-a-cow” or what you will) and the property of circularity. According to Plato, as matter approaches nearer to form it comes to be something, “being” meaning “being intelligible,” which to Plato is a legitimate ontological category (Plato posits degrees of being, contrary to the materialist’s zero-sum understanding of being). However, while there are certainly well-formed cows and malformed cows, even a cow still-born with deformity is a cow (if someone comes into the barn and asks, “What is that?” the right answer is “That’s a cow.”). Plato and Aristotle thought that species were fixed natural kinds (to use the standard phrase), but we (well, I) don’t think so: species are the kinds of things that come-to-be and pass away, just as individuals do. With circularity the situation is different. Being a circle just is having (instantiating) that property, and there is a threshold of trueness short of which we will say that the concrete particular isn’t a circle in a sense that it cannot be said, of any animal born of cows, that it “isn’t a cow.” Once a cow, always a cow, but a concrete particular can gain and lose the property of circularity.
"It's simple", he exclaimed, and continued "Please note - what I say here is illustrative and assumes a few things (open fermenters for one), i.e. I've made these numbers up, so you'll have to take my word for it that they are about right!"
I don’t know if he was lying to his editors or himself, but you don’t need a magic lasso to get the truth out of his scripts. Marston ties up his heroine far more often than she ties up anyone else.
Tilda paper and coloured the Magnolia FairyTale Tilda stamps with copics , I know I'am still a beginner but I think the colouring is nice, not as good as I wish but that takes time :-)).
and there won’t be any tear!
that never was it known, that anyone who fled to thy protection,
Directions: Heat the oil and sizzle the garlic together with the chili powder for half a minute. Next, add the cumin, coriander, turmeric and cilantro leaves. Cook for another minute or two, stirring often to blend. Add the coconut and mix this in too. Add the cooked beans and potatoes. Season and then pour in the lime or lemon juice. Cook for another 10 minutes or so until everything is blended together and then serve with green vegetables.
I don't think she meant it vidictive, in fact I know she didn't. She doesn't have it in her to purposefully hurt me like that. But it still hurt. I was feeling guilty over not being there for my children. Guilty that I was taking them to someone else to take care of, having to leave them again. I wanted to be the bestest mom they had. I didn't want my daughter to take my place. But, do to circumstances I had to leave them in her care.
Authorship and Copyright Notice: All Rights Reserved: Satya Sarada Kandula. This was first published on this site on Nov 22nd 2008.
Overhead three crows head
No accomplishment transcends the building of the character of a son or a daughter of God. President Benson (“The Honored Place of Woman”, Ensign, Nov. 1981, 104)
I wake up like clock work every morning due to this internal desire to water and care for these mean green growing machines.
When they all disagree
You've noticed that cocktails are all the rage. Probably always been all the rage, except during the late 60s, when they were considered mommy drinks. My mommy.
3. Dungarees- My ex-mother-in-law still calls jeans, dungarees. “I bought Alex a pair of dungarees today.” The term came from the fabric that was made and sold in Dungari Killa in Bombay (now Mumbai) India many years ago.
...And this interesting video on the BC Civil Liberties associations decision to demonize certain protesters (I liked this video because I felt the guy they talked to has some very important things to say!).
The first kick I took was when I hit the ground
What can one say about women who tell people they are fantastic in bed? As well as being extremely unladylike, I would consider their bragging to be devoid of substance. Men are simply too varied in their coital preferences to give such boasts any clear meaning: some of them want a dominatrix who will tie them to the bed-posts before straddling them; others desire a dainty wood nymph who will whimper submissively during copulation. Admittedly, a high-class harlot might be versatile enough to satisfy the diverse and peculiar whims of her clientele, but this is clearly not what the conceited rappess has in mind when she tells her listeners she’s the hottest snake-handler on the planet.
being extremely demanding.
For tonight's supper, I combined two of our favorites, Taco Night and Pizza Night, into Taco Pizza Night. Not only was in insanely cheap, but it was really delicious and will most definitely be making an appearance again soon!
- Fixed the rough transition between tracks 04 & 05
Do you no realize that your already hyper 4 year old that is already causing chaos is only going to get worse when you give them a glass of sugar topped off with more sugar?
Sobe Botanicals - Starlet
It was a labour of love and I learned a lot as I went along .. It is filmed with a fairly high res webcam and the characters and sets are laid on layers of glass ( a trick I learned from reading about how Mr Norsteyn works )
-Fox and Panda
As you can see, the psychedelic and op-art influences were being reflected in DC's romance line fairly early; this was the May 1968 issue. Just a beautiful cover by Ric Estrada. Note the tribute to Palisades Amusement Park, a longtime DC advertiser.
- Then add the tamarind paste and let it cook for 5 mins.
If you had ever asked me if I thought I would be traveling to the state where my father lived, to the place where I have two sisters and a brother...I would have said that it wouldn't happen.
We the Earthlings are born from the soil and from the dust to which we will return, and this is why what we used to call “the humanities” are also, from now on, our sciences.
First impressions of the London Underground, from 1863. The descriptions of railway food are priceless and still hold true today ...
For me personally, the term 'well-behaved' makes me prickle and feel very uneasy. Because what it usually means is a child behaving in a way that the adult deems unlikely to cause inconvenience to them (the adult).
A snake's hiss or the rattle of its tail
Sweet Thames, run softly, for I speak not loud or long.
02. Hands Together (9:49)
So far as our story approaches the end,
On the website, users ca chose a donation option. This options have values like “Donation Option – $50″. I have to submit them like that because that value needs to be passed to authorize.net as a custom field, but in order to capture the monetary value, I need to parse that string. At some point I end up wit just the number, and the sign (ej: $50). At this point it is just a matter of removing the sign from the number, so I do this:
The room in which Evans welcomed him with unnecessary effusion was littered with books. Every available chair was occupied. They lay in stacks upon the table, one half of which had been cleared for supper.
Review copy provided courtesy of publisher.
Laker shall always be remembered as the man who took 19 wickets in a single Test, a feat achieved in the Old Trafford Test in 1956 taking 9/37 in the first innings and 10/53 in the second. No other bowler has taken more than 16 wickets in a single Test, which speaks volumes of what Laker did in that game. What makes that feat even more impressive is that the other bowlers (Statham, Bailey and Locke) managed just one wicket between them in 123 overs. But Laker was much more than that single feat. He took 46 wickets in that series in 5 Tests at a mind-boggling average of 9.60. He averaged below 20 in a series on four more occasions (14.85 vs. South Africa, 1951; 19.50 vs. Pakistan, 1954; 12.00 vs. South Africa, 1955; and 10.17 vs. New Zealand, 1958).
"But it's not for me to question his story."
The good thing about the old churches in the country is that most of them are already improvements from the previous designs. Meaning, they’ve been structured to survive quakes (those frailes were damn good builders) but still, age is a factor. The church must begin to look into creating a central committee that would review the structural integrity of all the old churches in the island.
I’ve just stepped out of the shower and ask you to rub some oil on my back. I sit down adjacent to you, on the bed. You trickle it down my back, enjoying watching me shiver as it slides down my spine. Your warm hands start to massage it in and your kitty starts to purr. You are doing more than massaging body oil onto my back; you are turning me on again with each stroke. Each time you touch me you are caressing me with desire and lust, I turn my neck to the side to invite you to stroke me there too. Instead you kiss me, it makes me close my eyes and moan. Your massaging hands have moved to my shoulders while you continue to treat me with this sensuous indulgence.
Nice, and I'll take it certainly, but sort of WTF? :o)
* Length of Credit History 15%
I used to ask my staff for their input on different issues. Some would stop by my office to share their thoughts and I’d weigh their ideas before making a decision. However, time and again others who had chosen not to share their input would complain about how they were left out of the process. This was incredibly frustrating to me. I couldn’t figure why they couldn’t see that I had asked for their input. If they didn’t respond, how was that my fault? Thankfully, over time I began to ask myself where I was making the mistake. Why did people feel I was not including them? I hit my head against a wall until I learned about processes to gather input openly such as Fist to Five. I learned that consensus building was not necessarily about everyone agreeing but that it allowed us to get to the point where we could gather enough support to move forward with a decision. More importantly, it allowed for an open sharing of ideas and opinions. When our staff sat together at a meeting and engaged in the Fist to Five process, everyone could see who supported a decision, and who had questions. This was a huge change from what happened before and an incredible learning experience for me.
Best Novelette: “The Island”, Peter Watts (The New Space Opera 2; Eos)
Many of us become aware of these artificial phenomenon on a constant basis. Some know it as an intellectual concept, something to be discussed and thought about and pondered and rolled over on tongues and through ear canals.
Something about the season… the first pivot point of the year… the thinness of the boundaries… the in betweens… the sex…
Don't get me wrong, I loved working from 8 to 4:30, with a 55 minute lunch, weekends off, major holidays off and when Larry started working at this place we had weekends and evenings off together...plus they had 2 amazing gift shops, awesome cafeterias-Chick-Fil-A, Wendy's, Subway, Mi Tierra and most importantly 2 or 3 Starbucks...and we're not just talking about a couple of coffee carafe's brewing Starbucks, I'm talking full on, full menu, "would you like a pastry with that?", "hey I bought 6 Starbucks coffee mugs", Starbucks. I had it once a day, every day...sometimes twice a day. But alas, none compared to the stress.
5 understand
“No—Friday.” My husband repeats. He has to repeat this twice; then, a third time.
illusion & slopiness are directly linked to each other & therefore amplifying each other
Place beets in a saucepan and cover with water. Bring beets to a boil and simmer until tender about 25-30 minutes.
July 28 – Miami, FL @ Cruzan Ampitheater
Now if I could only get past the first sentence of the speed reading course, I'd be able to read 1000 blogs a day!
the kitchen later this year.
9. I've never had a pet
It's all a bit much.
I’d say that it was the closest we’ve come to having an actual fight in the three and a half years that we’ve been together. Sure, we’ve had little “tiffs”, we’ve gotten irritated at each other, we’ve even exchanged angry words via email….but Saturday night was, I think, the first time we’ve had an in-person argument.
This December, for the 3rd year, the North Pole Experience will throw open the doors to Santa's secret workshop and welcome families to a behind the scenes tour of Santa's hard working elves. But only those who hold the special Golden Ticket will get the chance learn the secret knock that opens the door to the workshop and the opportunity to meet Santa's head elf. Do your kiddos want to work side-by-side with the elves this year building toys?
career, and pay his sister back for a loan that no amount of money
The will is everything.
09/21/2011 BUY 0.02 eurusd 1.35926 09/27/2011 +6.57
Boy am I a dummy. Being out of commission over the weekend made me totally forget about the Saturday Give-Away! Congratulations to the randomly selected winner from last week.... JO! Jo, I'll be sending you your Digi Dancers shortly!
2 TSP vanilla
1. Cook pasta as directed on package. Keep it slightly al dente since it will cook a bit more with the other ingredients.
It's about a little girl who describes who she is. It describes her as having CF but it doesn't just describe her as having CF. I think it's an adorably illustrated, well written and very balanced book that my kids will use for years.
There are a few things that this view has going for it:
The blankets just emerged from the dryer and Charlie has completely buried herself, allowing only the tops of her ears to poke through. Precious critter, she loves a warm pile of handmade afghans and blankies, and I can't blame her a teeny-tiny little bit.
and the first of the random. Twitch a dance group whom I looooooooove
Eugene tried to find Oh Gu Ju in the airport by singing her song that was written for him. On the other place, the manager went to the broadcast venue and call Mr.Children member to come tonight via live broadcast. Finally, 5 minutes before the show ended all the members met and they perform at the last stage. The response were really great because the manager has spread the news that the problematic video of Eugene was actually a manipulated video by the other company.
- If you're dealing with a nursing strike, try taking a warm bath with the baby, or doing a nurse-in, where you and baby lie in bed and do as much skin-to-skin time as possible.*
Beyond that, it shifts the focus from home to things. Perhaps this is the crux of the matter and it matters only to me. I think homes tell stories. True, some tell sad and neglected stories and some tell desperate and pretentious stories and some tell heartfelt and lasting stories; they all speak to me. When there is no narrative, when we don't know that that particular African mask was brought back from the bachelor's grandfather's grand tour or if it was uncovered at a Paris flea market or simply received a good sanding after its purchase at Pier One, it is just a thing. It tells us nothing.
I am reminded of God of Small Things. Author Roy uses special tools to describe the character Velutha, a man without finger prints, who doesn’t leave foot prints on sand. Velutha raged in his youth as a communist activist, but when he was up against the brutal system, he chose to be fingerprint-less and footprint-less.
The AdWords judgment has answered a few of the questions, but it looks like we’ll have to carry on making up the rules as we go along.
in fact, even now I can wear it only when it's "fresh"; after a little while, it stretches out and I have to keep hitching it up. Any more adjusting, though, would interfere with the appliqué, which was not one of the stencils in the book, obviously.
Wait for green lights
I have done this too long. It makes me feel fake. I am lying to save my own ass. Why does the abuser get to act however he/she wants? Why do I have to strategize?
Peachstone’s focus is on content and ensuring we provide an engaging experience for the customer. We have to provide e-books because the market demands it and its expanding so fast. You simply can’t ignore that. Kindle already out sells hardbacks and it’s just a matter of time before e-books match paperbacks.
“That would be umm.. really helpful. You’d do that? “, I exclaimed, with sudden relief flowing through my veins. Considering the panic attacks I was having, people would have guessed I was planning my wedding.
“Whaddya do to my Mookie?” she screamed. “We got laws protecting animals here! You’re not in Mexico!”
If you want to believe in God, then do it with pride. Don't allow anyone to make you feel badly or weird, or awkward because they don't have the same belief system as yourself.
Hmm, let me think of a good word to go with our letter. "Risen" is the word I chose. I know I told you all before that I really like Easter and the hope it gives us for our future, so this should not come as too much of a shock. Just knowing that Jesus could overcome death, a death He didn't deserve but took on for us, should give us all a hope for our future and life after death.
Academically, Culver demands a lot from its students, both in and out of the classroom. Uniforms are mandatory (military-style for the men, traditional boarding school style for the women) at all times unless students are expressly told otherwise. They have a wide variety of AP course offerings (like most private schools) and several honors-type programs.
This salad is quick and easy to make. For those of you that are following along with the 21 day “Clean”, this salad fits the bill. I hope you like it.
(In a different thread, I investigated a hypothesis that this conversion range, when III-CaSO4 converts to II-CaSO4, might require a more delicate touch in the heating schedule, and that molds were more prone to crack here than in other parts of the ramp-up. The idea being that, with the lowest point of thermal conductivity occurring here, along with the inevitable non-uniform temperature gradient between interior and exterior mold layers, would produce conflicting compressive and tensile tangential forces in the mold wall, resulting in the symptom known as a “crack”. The consequence being that you could put short cuts in the heating schedule – heat faster in other parts of the ramp-up, and just go slow in this “danger zone”. So far, the hypothesis has not been proven, and no danger zone found).
Ill Fits – Piano’s in Lower East Side
For me it was kind of like a "blogparty" or a huge blindate because a lot of the girls there, I only "met" true their blogs.
· The Way of Ritual
Incidentally, Ilyumzhinov has made claims that he was once taken on board an alien spaceship which had come to planet Earth to take samples - and claims to have several witnesses. He is also president of Kalmykia, a small Buddhist region of Russia which lies on the shores of the Caspian Sea, where he, as president of the World Chess Federation, has spent tens of millions of dollars turning the impoverished republic into a mecca for international chess tournaments. - (see BBC report here)
Congratulations! You have 48 hours to email me at mom2my6pack@aol.com with your shipping information. :)
Prima Flowers and Lace
Climate Change, Global Broiling, Volatility and Extremes of Weather, Mega Swings of Temperature, Megadeluges and Megadroughts, Giant Dust Storms, Megaquakes, Super Volcanic Eruptions, Extreme Wildfires, Food and Water Scarcity, Deadly Diseases, Megadeaths (Forests, Plants, Animal Species…) Looming Megadisasters Could Impact 1/3 to 1/2 of Human Population
I especially love that I know it will be one of my final pictures in my mind as I leave this world.
It is time for another fun challenge at Cute Card Thursday and this week we are challenging you to use NO patterned paper! OMG. A little panic here at my craft desk for a second until I realised that I could make part 2 of my little alterend canvas set.
Many years later, when it so pleased God, Nehemiah, commissioned by the king of Persia, sent the descendants of the priests who had hidden the fire to look for it.
Mountain magnolia blossom.
-Fold the wrapper diagonally in half over the filling and press the edges of the wrapper to seal.
The butterflies are all sparkly paper, so I think she'll have a lot of fun with them. I can't wait for them to flutter onto her lap when she opens the pillow box... there are approximately 26 butterflies, so that will be fun. Teehee. I thought it would be neat for her to have bigger versions of the two animals I made for her cards, so I included those in her gift. The sweet deer has a twinkle in her eye via Stickles because she's twinkling with love for Emily. :o) And yes, I officially made my 1,000,001st sparkly penguin, this time with a sparkling purple scarf since she adores that color. A purple hippo was a must, as was a sweet button-centered snail. I certainly couldn't send her a gift box without some sweets, so I made two cupcakes in my favorite "wrappers"... I wish I could take her out for cupcakes. :o)
I don’t know if I’m ready to start downsizing yet. I don’t know if I’m ready to turn 40 next month. I don’t know if I’m ready to have all of my children in school full time. I don’t know if I’m ready to watch “the Jimmy” color his graying hair.
So, this summer, Mr. Yarnworks and I have had to attend a couple of weekend "Yellow Ribbon Events" put on by the National Guard. These are mandatory for the service member and optional for family members, but they're notoriously....well....boring. Brutal really. Especially for those of us with a few deployments under our belts.
Either way….purple is the color of domestic violence awareness.
Unlike Peter, Jesus is talking of forgiveness in terms of the Kingdom of God or Heaven, not in mere human terms. The reckoning that went on in the parable and that which goes on in God’s Kingdom are based on God’s standards of behaviour, not human ones. As Isaiah tells us: For my thoughts are not your thoughts, nor are your ways my ways, says the LORD.
The theme of "man versus concrete" is embodied by track 8, "Reduced to Clear", specifically in the opening verse:
Heat oven to 450 F with a pizza stone or overturned baking sheet in the oven & place a shallow baking pan underneath.
GIVE ME A BREAK
Since that day I am like a hawk any time I walk in to a new environment. I look around for things that I might recognize or have in common with the business as well as items of interest. Remember that people love talking about themselves. I have found that the easiest icebreaker is to find something in your surroundings or conversation that has a personal tie to the person you are trying to talk to and ask the right questions about it. I always find that it is easy to get more time out of people in a sales setting if you get them talking about themselves or something they are interested in.
I just don't know. I do know, however, that I'm tired of having the same conversation over and over. So much today's brand and blogger discussions are simply a rehash of the discussion that took place yesterday and the week before and so on back to about 2008.
Have you ever been to a movie premiere? I have never been to a real live premiere but just recently attended one online. I hope this is the newest trend because it was a lot of fun! I was invited to attend the event with other bloggers. Not only did we get to watch the movie together from the comfort of our own home but we had a chat window! So we got to chat, make comments, etc during the movie! Really, it was a blast. Then if that wasn't enough excitement we had a Q & A session right after the film with the Director and two of the actors!
Sharon also has the 4th instalment of our our mystery quilt, so hurry on over to see her. Sharon has also promised us a tutorial for a small project we can make.
hundred-year-old conspiracy involving the Jesuits, the Federal Reserve, China and the sinking of the Titanic, and discovers
Third, learn to live in the present. Do not stress over something in the past since you can’t change it or the future since you are not there yet. What you can control and make better is the present. Ensure that is stress free and that you are enjoying quality time, whether at work or at home with your loved ones.
Didn’t the PM say that India paid for the state visit? Then why Cabinet approve spending for that? How can cabinet approve spending for a position that doesn’t exist? Was the COP a part of this Cabinet? What happened to that? Was it lie?
MT's JAZZ GROUP PERSONNEL:
By popular demand I've tried to make this tutorial 'Idiot proof' and have tried to think of every little detail. If anyone has any problems or can see away in which I could improve on it - please let me know.
Its already Monday 10thJanuary2011....how time flies....
I found a few inspiration photos online, but I don't know how to contact the photographers, so I went to Houzz and found tons of photos.
to bake or stir fry chicken meat. So, I bought one bottle
And it gets worse. I kid you not. The book about Jemma and Elijah is followed by another about Villiers and some other girl.
I don’t know about you, but the words Korean, and barbecue bring up some questions for me. What do they mean by barbecue? Is it a rib house like I see in the Southern United States? What kind of meat is it? I didn’t think Koreans ate meat. Don’t they eat things like Kimchi, which is cabbage buried for months in the ground to ferment?
First of all, sorry to you nice followers for cluttering up your inboxes with emails about updating and all that. You have every right to delete them without looking at them. I’m really only trying to get this blog updated and running for right now. Trust me, there’s a lot of stuff.
He is also Professor of the History of Aesthetic Theory in the Faculty of Philosophy at the Pontifical Urban University, Rome,
Sam felt small under his stare, so she pulled Abby out from behind her father. Safety in numbers. "This is my sister, Abby."
~"I am the Alpha and Omega, the beginning and the end, the first and the last."
All I say, this stuff is AWESOME! Screw on lids, stackable, freezable, OK to be used on microwave and dishwasher safe. I haven't seen anything better at Babies R Us. So yes, it is unfortunate that I have to purchase this from One Step Ahead directly and had to pay shipping for it. But it's worth it. Trust me on this.
Karen Henry Clark wrote her first story when she was four years old by dictating the tale of a runaway popcorn ball to her father. From that moment on, she wanted to become an author. It took longer than she anticipated, as most things do in life. SWEET MOON BABY is her first book. She lives with her husband and daughter in St. Paul, Minnesota, where she loves to watch the moon rise over the Mississippi, a wide and wonderful river like the one in this book.
Two more weeks of summer vacation.
My blog may seem a little random at times, but that's what I like about it. Everyone feels confident enough to take part in challenges and it's great seeing work displayed.
Legends being what they are, a number of different - and sometimes contradictory - descriptions of the cluricaun are available, and so I felt rather at liberty to pick and choose. I gave my cluricaun the red cap that some sources describe as distinguishing him from the leprechaun, and ignored any portrayal that gave him a green jacket, silver-buckled shoes, or any item of clothing that might make a Tourist Board official sit up and take notice. Some accounts have him as surly, others jolly; this I put down to individual differences, and decided that my cluricaun would be something of a cheerful comedy drunk. He was small, of course (everyone seemed to agree that a cluricaun is one of the Little People) and a red nose was a fairly commonly described feature - to which I added cheerfully red cheeks over a greyish complexion.
We are very lucky to live in his time. Seamus Heaney is one of the greatest living poets today in the English language and his words will last and last.
It depends on how the issue is framed and who is framing it. But it goes something like this: Proponents of restarting some of the nuclear facilities are saying that parts of the country will experience energy shortfalls, leaving not just homeowners to suffer but also the country’s economy as big businesses potentially compensate and reduce production. And, relying on fossil fuels will not just create more emissions but also increase energy costs for those same businesses and consumers.
Being at a cocktail party and having someone tell you an uncomfortable story about their dead relative or their private lives. This is definitely an awkward situation that believe it or not I have had to get out of before. Here is how to fix it.
The challenge for me is my business admin approach to life. Lists. Dot points. Cross things out and move onto the next task, human or event. I wanted to get enough career fulfillment to then feel satisfied to join life, for real. But, its a waiting game that could go on for ever. I’m living on the side lines at the moment, I occasionally run in and take over for a few minutes whilst one of the players has a breather. I joined a theatre company and let my spirit come alive for two hours a week between 8 and 10pm on Thursday nights. I occasionally let myself go to shows that make my soul sing: But hopefully not too much cos then I end up all jaded that my life is not quite that vibrant or magnificent looking.
yet for all of my life the price I will pay…
completing your position, should you request one.
Dye Ink: (Tuxedo Black) Tsukineko, (Soap Powder, Seed Packet, Spice Tin, Cough Syrup, Chili Powder, Lemon Drop, Chicken Feed, Chewing Gum, Stick Candy) Ranger Industries
These are realms which the now stultified and immobile yang does not understand. She is the wave form of light; she is “the tiger” of which Einstein knew he’d grasped the tail, but understood he would never comprehend the whole of. The science of his mind was inspired by the wisdom of that intangible feminine element. The now overly structured world which we inhabit despises the improvisational, unpredictable, serendipitous realm of the feminine, much to the detriment of our potential for integrated, human brilliance. And a great deal of effort has been expended in order to destroy, demean and control that elemental. It is important to remember, however, in freeing ourselves from the prisons so precisely built and mortared by limited hands, that, just because you do not understand something does not mean it is pathological. Unable to see into the dark, that is exactly what the male brain has attempted to do with the right side of their brains, so well-embodied by the female. The stones and walls that have been built are, in fact, a direct reflection of the inabilities and limiting fears of the minds that built them.
So now, if you go to any traditional baby store, you'll see the divide immediately. Right or wrong, girls get pink, certainly, and purple. And sparkles and butterflies and swirly writing and glitter and princess references (oh, the princess references). Boys get blue, green, brown, orange (apparently) and construction vehicles and dinosaurs. In buying clothes for Carys, I look in both sections and buy what catches my eye, be it pink or blue or chartreuse. But really? It doesn't matter what she wears. At this point she has zero preference (and understandably would rather be naked), so I'll dress her in the colors I prefer, which tends to skew more towards what I consider gender neutral. In today's society, this is a no-no until she "looks like a girl." However, the truth of the matter is that clothes and colors don't matter: Not only has she been called a "he" in a white onesie and no other gender indicators, but I've had her in a pink dress with a pink bow and people comment on my "darling boy."
So, I tried my hand at re-creating it in a “lightened-up” way – it obviously doesn’t taste exactly the same – but I think it’s pretty bangin’ delicious! I made this for a main course, but I’m sure you could serve it as a delicious appetizer for a few people as well!
This trust does not include their other life choices. In other words, if you are academically unschooling, you still make the choices, or at least must approve the choices, for bedtime, food, clothes, etc. Anything that does not involve school recognized learning. Sometimes, but not always, academic unschooling leads to radical unschooling as parents see how well their children choose.
I praise the Lord for every day, but especially for this day, of all days. It helps to keep me centered and focused on Him, and to remember the reason we are here. Everything starts, revolves around, and progresses from this first day of the week. Imagine the central force of God’s power in this day through Jesus Christ, His Son, the impact that it has on the whole week, and all time.
“They come against a man who wants to be benevolent,” Canada said of developer Bruce Ratner, noting FCR’s plan to use union labor.
things that we're grateful for. So I've complied a list and I hope it
Martin Luther King Center, Cuba; Madres de Plaza Mayo, Argentina;
One of things he wanted to do was visit Mast General Store - one of our favorite places ever to poke around. You can find all kinds of cool treasures here - so while he was looking at toys and candy, I found myself checking out the kitchen section. I picked up some really cute old fashioned ice cream sundae type dishes and immediately started daydreaming of ways to use them.
I have subscriptions to a couple of magazines, I have my usual book reading (and I still haven't got through all my real paper books yet), and there is also the press to catch up on on a daily basis. Enter the kindle and every morning I receive an email giving me a list of all the free books available that day. I can usually find one that I might want to read. So it gets added to the kindle, waiting to be chosen. Then while I am on amazon I often find other stuff to buy, which just adds more books to the virtual pile.
I'm not sure what exactly sparked off this miserable journey of thought but it continued with the inevitability of a train crash - one that you can see is about to happen and you can do nothing to stop. So follow it I did, to its logical end....
A kind light on our plight.
Saturday: Leftovers or popcorn buffet
Yes, yes, y’all! This past Thursday the finals went down and it was one dope night!
Best of luck to all racing this weekend!
FY 2008 – $812 billion
I guess "take a picture" was too far of a stretch.
Fragment XI
Be more like Carrie and less like Samatha.
Sunday: chicken Rice & broccoli
I am very pleased with this. The ruleset is basically the same it was in that first Fellowship rulebook, only slightly tighter and clearer (as if it was ever complex). The Legions of Middle-Earth book is a beautiful and fun guide to create your own army, springing into mind infinite scenarios. And now you´ll be able to play big big battles with the War of the Ring rules.
If that wasn't bad enough, the craft businesses with Saturday stalls have been told not to come back. They were expecting to trade seven days a week throughout December as in previous years and make most of their money during this time.
(Text is copied and pasted, so don't make fun of me for the misspellings and grammar errors...btw, I didn't respond to any of these emails - but the running commentary he provides makes me wonder what kind of conversation *he thinks* we were having!)
On closer inspection there are plenty of positive points.
Who: MS Ohio Valley Chapter President, Kim Deaton, MS Ohio Valley Chapter Communications Director, Rich Walburg and MS Ohio Valley Chapter Spokesperson, Bari Thornberry
She was looking for some some good bugs way up there...it says in the book that they don't drill like other woodpeckers...they chip away the old bark...this is the first time I've seen one of these...we usually have the Gila woodpeckers here...boy do they drill into the trees...you should see the scars on my big apple tree!
Finally, at around 10:00 PM, we mixed two pounds of ziti rigate with our delicious sauce, sat down on the couch, and enjoyed the fruits of our labor.
The submission deadline is September 25th. Email submissions to charee@g45papers.com. On September 26th all of the submissions will be uploaded to our Facebook photos and you will get to vote for your favorite submission by "Like"-ing it! Voting is from September 26th to 7am on Septmeber 30th. The TWO projects with the most likes win! Winners will be announced on Friday morning at 8am on our Facebook and on our blog.
I love the feeling that she's always with me and I'm never alone. It's like my own little sidekick; my little confidant. I talk to her, poke her, read to her...when I have to leave the actual real baby alone in the actual real world I think I'll be lonely.
I've got another new art journal page to share today. It seems like I've been working in my journal like crazy lately. It's helped that I've been incorporating my sketches into my pages. I don't know why I didn't start doing this a long time ago!
Scientists measured this cellular aging by studying the ends of children’s chromosomes, called telomeres, according to Idan Shalev, lead author of a study in today’s Molecular Psychiatry.
But the boss's voice changed, and I knew we was beat.
Time Fades Away was a sign of things to come musically for Neil Young, while Time Fades Away ventured into different music territory, his following two releases would continue the trend of being recorded live, but in the studio. Neil Young recorded the album Tonight’s The Night next in 1973. The album was inspired by the deaths of Crazy Horse guitarist Danny Whitten and Young friend/roadie Bruce Berry. For the album Neil Young put together a new backing group known as The Santa Monica Flyers, which was a band featuring the rhythm section of Crazy Horse and Nils Lofgren on guitar. The albums title track “Tonight’s The Night” mentions Bruce Berry by name and the track “Come On Baby Let’s Go Downtown” features vocals and guitar from Danny Whitten (the song was a live recording from 1970). The album is known for featuring darker subject matter and for its raw, often crude production style. The album was recorded live with no overdubs and was meant to capture the band in the moment, with or without mistakes. Neil had this to say of the production values in Shakey: A Neil Young Biography:
Moving on I managed to get a try of some Tyne Bank Piccolo Black in bottled form for the first time. This literally black well-carbonated number offers roasty, grainy coffee and chocolate interluding into tropical citric hop notes over a fairly light-bodied frame. I can imagine this appealing to both fans of stouts and pale ales as a sort of hybrid style. Though despite all of Tyne Bank's more adventurous numbers, my favourite, Monument Bitter was still conditioning and due to replace the Blonde Star when it had finished.
They’d opened their pressies whilst my eyes were closed, and small mad one was causing complete havoc with her whoopee cushion. Well fruitloopmum fans, you know how laughter can be infectious?
Comments
we are the only house
KUALA LUMPUR – MALAYSIAN state-controlled conglomerate Sime Darby Berhad on Monday named Mohamad Bakke Salleh, a top official at plantation giant Felda Group, as its new president and chief executive.
Other related books:
My plan this time was to hit fast and hard on the scouts. They were 8 figures, far away from the reinforcements, so if I could kill them fast then I would just need to kill 4 more. Hopefully some archers, since they were less armored.
4. A Swendenborg Vision
When separation was imminent (in 1965), Eddie Barker, as Law Minister, drew up the draft legislation for the separation. But he did not include an undertaking by the Federation Government to guarantee the observance of the two water agreements between the PUB (Public Utilities Board) and the Johor state government. I asked Choo to include this. She drafted the undertaking as part of the constitutional amendment of the Federation of Malaysia Constitution itself.
Thank you everyone for you kindness and generosity! I will be doing this again next spring with hopefully even bigger and better blog candy!
It's shyt like this is why we don't have jack shyt in this state. No forward thinking. The legislature (and by extension the people) have no desire of being considered World Class in anything other than high school football. All the oil and money and opportunity and former Presidents at our beck and call, and Houston is about number 4,234,421 on the top 5 million places in the world people want to visit. Dallas clocks in at 4,126,101, wedged between Quetta and Ciudade de Deus. And we wonder why we have to damn near have to give sexual favors to get a Superbowl around here. The Essence Festival left a sprawling relatively safe Houston to move BACK TO NEW ORLEANS AFTER THEY WERE DECLARED A MURDER CAPITOL! That should tell you something right there. The Olympic committee can't stop laughing every time Houston puts in a bid (it'll be an all Indoor Olympics). If it wasn't for Joey Greco, cocaine, and football team that hasn't won shyt since I was a virgin, Dallas would be right there with us.
Story blurb: Jack Hardigan’s Hellcat fighter squadron blew the Japanese Zekes out of the blazing Pacific skies. But a more subtle kind of hell was brewing in his feelings for rookie pilot Fred Trusteau. As another wingman watches – and waits for the beautiful woman who loves Jack – Hardigan and Trusteau cut a fiery swath through the skies from Wake Island to Tarawa to Truk, there to keep a fateful rendezvous with love and death in the blood-clouded waters of the Pacific.
Now, we really need to have those spots. The van is big enough that even though it fits in a regular parking space, no problem, then we don't have the room to get the lift out.
I scoured the web for a resolution for my problem. There are a few ideas but the one I took hold of was the suggestion to use Dixie Cups. Good idea but they still moved too much for me.
Music has always been a big part of my life, with having the biggest record collection of all my friends, leading to my dream job of owning my own music store (MISTER DISC). What goes hand-in-hand with stimulating myself to auralgasms listening to tuneage every day? Reading about my fave bands and singers tales of success, destruction and resurrection. I suck up rock and roll debauchery like a Hoover set to stun and my passion knows no boundaries. I can go from Debbie Harry talking about Blondie’s early NYC days to Ace Frehley saying how much he hates Gene Simmons in Kiss to Sammy Hagar commenting Eddie Van Halen is not very hygienic to Steven Tyler still being mad at Aerosmith for not coming to see him in the hospital to the current tome on my nightstand, Lemmy of Motorhead… God bless rock n roll.
People talk big now but wait till the Government says you are going to prison for owning a certain gun and see how most cave in. It happened with the National Firearms Act of 1934 where all fully auto and short barreled shotguns were banned, they were not grandfathered in. You had better think about it now. It's easy to say you will hide them but what if your neighbors and family know you have them, what if your wife cries and begs you to obey the law to avoid prison, what if there's a reward paid for turning in violators, who else knows your secrets. What will you do.
Him: Ya, in Dark Angel.
But I think Ehrman moves a bit too fast here. Michael Brown responds to this very objection in his book Answering Jewish Objections to Jesus (Vol. 3). He writes,
Today our sons cut lawns and put together another bench.
So here’s what I did:
- 1/4 cup diced dried papaya
The safety vest does the job. It’s light-weight and I feel a lot safer wearing it on an early morning walk., Not something you would wear with winter gear for Search and Rescue, but perfect for wearing over a layer of clothing. Breathable and visible., Not much to say. It works, it’s good quality, and it’s cheap. I use it for walking the dog on a windy…
Ugh. I'm turning TWENTY. Like, 20.
Savannah is 6 months away. Our training plan starts the first week of June. This gives us a little more time to ready ourselves for the five months of training.
2. Go to line 7.
FRENCH WHITE OPEN PAPER ROSE
well, another 3 weeks have gone by and I've forgotten all about that little goal I made at the beginning of 2011.
Obviously this is a really massive concept, so I’m going to focus primarily on the early and Medieval model, and in particular, those aspects that have survived into the modern practice of Islam.
Eragon, a Dragon Rider, is swept into a world of magic and power, discovering that he alone has the power to save or destroy an Empire. I suppose i was too caught in the movie dragon battles, and wanted to compose music that reflects the rise of an empire after its destruction.
